<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89414-0002 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.4-14-89.f2.A1001</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">10 CFR Part 2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 3150-AC44</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Submission and Management of Records and Documents Related to theLicensing of a Geologic Repository for the Disposal of High-Level RadioactiveWaste</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Nuclear Regulatory Commission.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rulemaking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Nuclear Regulatory Commission is amending the Commission'sRules of Practice in 10 CFR Part 2 for the adjudicatory proceeding on theapplication for a license to receive and possess high-level radioactivewaste at a geologic repository operations area pursuant to 10 CFR Part60. The revisions establish the basic procedures for the licensing proceeding,including procedures for the use of the Licensing Support System, an electronicinformation management system, in the proceeding. The revisions are basedon the deliberations of the Commission's High-Level Waste Licensing SupportSystem Advisory Committee. The Advisory Committee was composed of organizationsrepresenting the major interests likely to be affected by the rulemaking,and was established by the Commission pursuant to the Federal AdvisoryCommittee Act, 5 U.S.C. App. 1, in September 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>May 15, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Francis X. Cameron, Office ofthe General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC20555, Telephone: 301-492-1623.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>On August 5, 1987, the Commission announced (52 FR 29024) the formationof the High-level Waste Licensing Support System Advisory Committee (``negotiatingcommittee'') to develop recommendations for revising the Commission's Rulesof Practice in 10 CFR Part 2 for the adjudicatory proceeding on the applicationfor a license to receive and possess high-level radioactive waste (``HLW'')at a geologic repository operations area (``HLW licensing proceeding'').\1\<NOTE/> The negotiating committee sought concensus on the proceduresthat would govern the HLW licensing proceeding, focusing primarily on theuse of an electronic information management system known as the LicensingSupport System (``LSS''), in the HLW licensing proceeding. The objectiveof the negotiated rulemaking was to develop the essential features of theprocedural rules for effective Commission review of the U.S. Departmentof Energy (DOE) license application within the three-year time period requiredby section 114(d) of the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982, as amended (``NWPA'').The negotiating committee completed its deliberations in July 1988. Basedon the committee deliberations, the Commission approved a proposed rulethat would revise 10 CFR Part 2 to establish the procedures for the HLWproceeding. The proposed rule was published on November 3, 1988. The commentperiod closed on December 5, 1988. After consideration of the public comments,the Commission is promulgating this final rule.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ <T3>See </T3>Agreement in Principle Between the Department of Energy (DOE)and the Nuclear Regulatory Commission (NRC) on the Development of a LicensingSupport Systems (LSS), February 27, 1987.The LSS is intended to provide for the entry of, and access to, potentiallyrelevant licensing information as early as practicable before DOE submitsthe license application for the repository to the Commission. The LSS wouldcontain the documentary material generated by DOE, NRC and other partiesto the licensing proceeding, which are relevant to licensing of the repository.All parties would then have access to this system well before the proceedingbegins. Access to these documents will be provided through electronic fulltext search capability. This provides the flexibility of searching on anyword or word combinations within a document and thus facilitates the rapididentification of relevant documents and issues. Because the relevant informationwould be readily available through access to the LSS, the initial time-consumingdiscovery process, including the physical production and on-site reviewof documents by parties to the HLW licensing proceeding, will be substantiallyreduced.The use of the LSS in the HLW licensing proceeding is to provide for timelyreview of the DOE license application by_andbullet; Eliminating the most burdensome and time-consuming aspect of thecurrent system of document discovery_i.e., the physical production of documentsafter the license application has been filed_because the LSS will providefor the identification and submission of discoverable documents beforethe license application is submitted;andbullet; Eliminating the equally burdensome and numerous FOIA requestsfor the same information that both DOE and the NRC will surely receivebefore and after the application is filed if the LSS does not become areality;andbullet; Enabling the comprehensive and early technical review of the millionsof pages of relevant licensing material by the DOE and NRC staff, throughthe provision of electronic full text search capability which will allowthe quick identification of relevant documents and issues;andbullet; Enabling the comprehensive and early review of the millions ofpages of relevant licensing material by the potential parties to the proceeding,so as to permit the earlier submission of better focused contentions resultingin a substantial saving of time during the proceeding;andbullet; Providing for the electronic transmission of all filings duirngthe hearing, thereby eliminating a significant amount of delay.<T3>The Negotiating Committee.</T3> The Commission used the process ofnegotiated rulemaking to develop the proposed rule. In negotiated rulemaking,the representatives of parties who may be affected by a proposed rule,including the Commission, convene as a group over a period of time to attemptto reach consensus on the proposed rule.The first meeting of the negotiating committee was held in September 1987.The negotiating committee completed its deliberations in July 1988.The members of the negotiating committee are_<ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; DOE</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; NRC</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; State of Nevada</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; A coalition of Nevada local governments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; A coalitation of industry groups (Edison Electric Institute/UtilityNuclear Waste Management Group/U.S. Council for Energy Awareness)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; National Congress of American Indians</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; A coalition of national environmental groups (EnvironmentalDefense Fund/Sierra Club/Friends of the Earth).</ITAG>All members of the negotiating committee, with the exception of the industrycoalition, agreed to the draft text of the proposed rule that was discussedby the committee at its final meeting (``final negotiating text''). Underthe committee protocols, the dissenting vote by the industry precludedcommittee consensus on the proposed rule.\2\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ In the August 5, 1987, <T4>Federal Register </T4>Notice that initiated the negotiated rulemaking,the Commission clearly indicated that the LSS was only one of the mechanismsthat the Commission was considering to streamline the licensing process.However, all participants on the negotiating committee, including the industry,initially agreed that a significant contributer to licensing delay wasdocument discovery and motions practice_issues that the LSS was intendedto address. In this regard, the industry, later stated that the LSS wouldresult in little change in the length of the licensing proceeding withoutfurther procedural changes.Those participants who approved the final negotiating text are DOE, theState of Nevada, the coalition of Nevada local governments, the NationalCongress of American Indians, the coalition of national environmental groups,and the NRC staff. The final negotiating text was carefuly drafted withthe full participation of people with strong experience and backgroundin NRC practice. It reflected the concerns of the major interests affectedby the rulemaking. In fact, the industry coalition, although dissentingon the final negotiating text, fully participated in the drafting of thefinal text, and had considerable influence on the wording of the finaltext.\3\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ The Commission notes that the industry coalition's dissenton the final negotiating text was based on the same rationale_the costof the LSS_that it had set forth at the initial meeting of the negotiatingcommittee some ten months earlier.The proposed rule was issued for a thirty-day comment period. The participantson the negotiating committee who approved the final negotiating text agreedto refrain from commenting negatively on the final negotiating text, ifthat text was published by the Commission as a proposed rule. The industrycoalition, as well as any nonparticipants in the negotiation, were freeto comment critically on any aspect of the proposed rule, including costaspects of the LSS. Consistent with the negotiating committee's functionadvise the Commission on the LSS rulemaking, the staff submitted the commentson the proposed rule to the negotiating committee for review and comment.The public comments on the proposed rule, and any comments from the negotiatingcommittee (the Commission received comments from the State of Nevada, theNational Congress of American Indians, and Lincoln County, Nevada), aresummarized below.The comment period on the proposed LSS rule closed on December 5, 1988.The Commission received nine comments. Seven of these comments were fromvarious segments of the Nuclear industry, one was from DOE expressing supportfor the LSS rulemaking and recommending several clarifications, and onewas from formal trial counsel in the Commission's Office of the GeneralCounsel, now with the firm of Hopkins, Sutter, Hamel andamp; Park. Most ofthe industry comments consisted of an endorsement of the recommendationscontained in the comment letter submitted by the Edison Electric Instituteand the Utility Nuclear Waste Management Group(``EEI/UNWMG''). As notedearlier, EEI/UNWMG, along with the U.S. Council on Energy Awareness, representedthe industry on the HLW LSS Advisory Committee. The industry comments willbe discussed in the context of the EEI/UNWMG comments, except where thereis a significant difference in an individual comment letter. The discussionof the public comments will focus on the issues of cost-benefit, the topicalguidelines for the submission of documents ot the LSS, and the non-LSSaspects of the rule.<T3>Benefit-cost</T3>. The industry argues that the LSS is a ``gigantic,highly complicated, and extraordinarily expensive system'' that will notsignificantly assist Commission decision-making on the construction authorizationfor the repository within the NWPA timeframe. Rather than leading to areduction of the time for licensing, the industry believes that the LSSwould lead to an extension of the licensing time. Therefore, the industrydoes not believe that the benefits of the LSS justify the costs (estimatedby DOE to be $200 million over a ten year period), and consequently, doesnot support the LSS.The industry argument against the LSS has two basic components: (1) TheLSS would not enable the Commission to meet the three-year schedule forthe issuance of the construction authorization mandated by the NWPA; and(2) the costs of the LSS have been underestimated. As an alternative tothe LSS, the industry has proposed a microfiche-based system in which relevantdocuments would be stored on microfiche but would not be captured in electronicsearchable full text. However, the indexes to the documents and the bibliographicheaders for the documents would be ``computerized'', presumably in electronicsearchable full text. Parties could request a copy of a doucment from theLSS Administrator, and receive it by overnight mail.According to the industry, the LSS would lengthen the licensing processfor the following reasons: andbullet; The industry argues that the LSS will create new procedural issuesover which litigation is likely_for example, the LSS Administrator's certificationthat DOE is in substantial and timely compliance with the document submissionrequirements in the rule. In response, the Commission notes that, althoughthe LSS rule does establish some new procedural requirements, these requirementsare necessary to ensure that the parties subject to the rule are in substantialand timely compliance with its provisions, and thereby facilitate compliancewith the NWPA's three-year time frame. In particular, the certificationof DOE compliance is necessary to assure that relevant documents are inthe LSS as soon as possible, so as to allow for early, pre-license applicationdiscovery. Any disputes over compliance with the rule will be resolvedby the Pre-License Application Licensing Board established in andSection;2.1010<T3>before</T3> the license application is submitted.andbullet; The industry argues that the actual performance of the LSS isunlikely to live up to the expectations of the parties because documentsthat should be in the data base will be missed entirely, and that someof the documents captured could easily be incomplete in their electronicform. This will lead to attacks on the accuracy and completeness of thedata base. The Commission notes that the final rule contains several provisionsintended to minimize and correct inaccuracies and incompleteness. Section2.1009 requires each party to establish procedures to capture the requireddocuments. This section also establishes an early and continuous certificationprocess, in which a party's designated official must certify that the partyis in compliance with document submission requirements of the rule. Section2.1003(h)(2)(i) requires the LSS Administrator to begin monitoring DOEcompliance with the document submission requirements well before the licenseapplication is submitted. Section 2.1004 provides a mechanism for amendmentsand additions to be made to the data base. In addition, the LSS will beoperational before the license application is submitted, allowing timefor any errors or omissions to be corrected. Furthermore, an image of alldocuments will be available as a backup for the electronic text. Finally,as noted above, the rule establishes a Pre-License Application LicensingBoard to resolve any disputes over accuracy and completeness of documentsbefore the license application is submitted.andbullet; The industry argues that the vast quantities of data availablein electronic full text will provide parties with the opportunity to generateeven greater amounts of discovery. The Commission notes that the LSS ruleestablishes requirements for the submission of relevant documents in advanceof the license application. Because of the substantial amount of informationthat will be provided, the Commission does not anticipate continual discoveryrequests for large amounts of additional documents. Furthermore, the HearingLicensing Board is authorized to limit discovery, specifically taking intoaccount the early availability of information provided by the LSS, andcompliance with the NWPA's three-year schedule. See andSection;andSection;2.1018(c),2.1021(a)(5), 2.1022(a)(6).andbullet; The industry argues that disputes over the use of written interrogatoriesare certain to ``plague the licensing board and discovery master.'' Section2.1018(a)(2) provides for the use of written interrogatories only if authorizedby the discovery master or Hearing Licensing Board upon a showing thatinformal discovery, which, as indicated below, is limited to such mattersas the names of witnesses, has failed. Furthermore, in ruling upon a motionto authorize written interrogatories, the discovery master, or the HearingLicensing Board may consider whether the request creates the potentialfor unreasonably interfering with meeting the three-year schedule in theNWPA. For these reasons, the Commission does not believe that disputesover written interrogatories will ``plague'' the boards, or lengthen thelicensing process.andbullet; The industry argues that system failures will trigger action tobring the entire licensing process to a halt. The Commission does not anticipatethat the LSS will be unavailable for critical periods or lengths of time.DOE will design and develop the LSS well in advance of the license application.This period also includes development of a prototype system, as well astesting of the LSS before it becomes operational. Furthermore, the DOEdesign, development, and testing program will be conducted with input fromNRC and other affected parties. The Commission believes that the design,testing, and development process will eliminate the major causes of systemfailure before the hearing process begins. In summary, the Commission does not agree with the industry opinion thatthe LSS would add time to the licensing process. The staff continues tobelieve that the LSS is the best alternative for providing a high qualityand efficient review of the DOE license application within the schedulemandated by the NWPA. As noted above, this will be accomplished through_andbullet; Eliminating the most burdensome and time-consuming aspect of thecurrent system of document discovery_i.e., the physical production of documentsafter the license application has been filed_because the LSS will providefor the identification and submission of discoverable documents beforethe license application is submitted; andbullet; Eliminating the equally burdensome and numerous FOIA requestsfor the same information that both DOE and the NRC will surely receivebefore and after the application is filed if the LSS does not become areality; andbullet; Enabling the comprehensive and early technical review of the millionsof pages of relevant licensing material by the DOE and NRC staff, throughthe provision of electronic full text search capability, which will allowthe quick identification of relevant documents and issues; andbullet; Enabling the comprehensive and early review of the millions ofpages of relevant licensing material by the potential parties to the proceeding,so as to permit the earlier submission of better focused contentions, resultingin a substantial saving of time during the proceeding;andbullet; Providing for the electronic transmission of all filings duringthe hearing, thereby eliminating a significant amount of delay. The Commission believes that any document management system for the HLWproceeding must meet all of these objectives in order for the Commissionto meet the NWPA schedule, while still providing for a high quality reviewof the license application. No other alternative, including the industrymicrofiche proposal, will accomplish this. As stated by the National Congress of American Indians (NCAI) in its reviewof the benefits of the LSS_<ITAG tagnum="21">The LSS benefit which is vitally important to potential intervenors_andof no interest to the industry_is its potential to facilitate the thoroughnessof program reviews. Unlike the nuclear industry, Indian tribes, statesand other potential intervenors view the NRC licensing for a repositoryto be more than a troublesome procedural hoop through which DOE must jumpon its way to repository waste acceptance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Indian tribes, states, local governments and citizens' organizationsthat might become intervenors in that process have a responsibility totheir respective constituents to see that the resolution of those questionsis done as meaningfully and correctly as possible. In other words, theseentities' primary interest in this entire program_one which is manifestlyconsistent with the general public interest_is to make sure that the Commission'sfinal determinations in this matter are as nearly correct as possible.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To discharge this responsibility, which is also mandated by the NuclearWaste Policy Act (``NWPA'') with respect to the host state and any affectedIndian tribe, they must be intimately involved in the review of the program.To effectively participate in program reviews, the prospective intervenorsmust have excellent access to the information base the program is using.They do not now have even marginally adequate access to that information.The LSS_even a flawed, incomplete LSS_promises to vastly improve that access.</ITAG>NCAI concluded that_<ITAG tagnum="20">the proposed LSS passes the cost/benefit analysis because the keybenefit of improved access to program information will certainly be servedby the LSS and the costs of the LSS are not a significant fraction of theoverall waste program costs. We also support DOE's and NRC's conclusionthat the LSS would shorten the licensing period for a repository and, inthat respect, would be likely to reduce overall program costs rather thanincrease them.</ITAG>One public commenter, the former NRC trial counsel, endorses the benefitsof the LSS and agrees with the staff belief that ``the LSS will facilitategreatly the objective of realizing an initial decision within 3 years ofthe filing of the application.'' This commenter goes on to state that ``theHLW license hearings will be delayed substantially'' without the LSS. Thisis due to the fact that the LSS rulemaking will remove document discoveryas an obstacle to timely completion of the HLW proceeding by providingrelevant documents well in advance of the license application. As furtherstated by this commenter_<ITAG tagnum="21">Potential parties will have access to the LSS well in advance of thetime for submitting requests for a hearing. Thus, the time needed for prospectiveparties to digest pertinent information will not become a critical pathmatter because it should be largely completed before the prehearing processbegins. Moreover, all hearing requesters should be better informed withrespect to the subject matter, and they should be able to frame meaningfuland material issues for litigation. . . . Finally, the establishment ofthe Pre-License Application Licensing Board to hear and rule on documentproduction controversies should assure that the delay attendant to legalposturing over document production will not impact the hearing schedule.In sum, the proposed regulations would * * * remove one of the greatestcauses of delay from the NRC adjudicatory hearing process.</ITAG>The DOE benefit-cost analysis indicates that approximately $200 millionwould be saved for <T3>each year </T3>of licensing delay eliminated due to the LSS. The finalrule establishes procedures for the HLW, including a model hearing schedule,that will allow the Commission to reach a decision on the constructionauthorization within the timeframe specified in section 114(d) of the NWPA.However, even if the process were to take up to one-third longer than thefinal rule envisions, the LSS would still result in eliminating substantialtime from current licensing practice. Under these circumstancs, the benefitsof the final rule would exceed the costs of implementing the LSS. Moreover,the Commission is pursuing still other methods for streamlining the licensingprocess, such as using rulemaking to resolve substantive licensing issuesbefore the license application is submitted.The second part of the industry comments on the costs and benefits of theLSS is the adequacy of the DOE benefit-cost analysis. The industry doesnot believe that the DOE analysis is adequate for a number of reasons,primarily because the DOE analysis did not consider alternatives to theLSS such as the industry microfiche system. In addition, the industry notesthat the estimated $200 million cost is only projected over a ten yearperiod, and the cost is only presented in 1988 dollars. Finally, the industryclaims that the size, complexity, and ``revolutionary'' nature of the LSSwill significantly escalate the costs of the system.In response, the Commission notes that the scope of the DOE benefit-costanalysis was determined in reference to the objectives of the LSS identifiedearlier_facilitating the discovery and review of relevant documents. Thestaff, DOE, and other participants on the negotiating committee did notbelieve that any alternative other than an electronic full text searchsystem could satisfy these objectives, and thereby allow the Commissionto meet the NWPA schedule, while still providing for a high quality reviewof the relevant licensing information. Therefore, the DOE did not evaluatethe benefits and cost of alternatives that did not include an electronicfull text search capability of the documents in the system.Although the industry microfiche alternative might provide for the collectionof relevant documents in advance of licensing, it does not provide forthe electronic full text search <T3>within </T3>those documents, such as the 7000-page Site CharacterizationPlan. The Commission does not believe that the mere <T3>availability </T3>of documents in hard copy or microfiche without electronicfull text search capability will permit an adequate substantive reviewof the documents in the HLW proceeding by the staff itself or any otherparty, nor will it permit the hearing to be completed within the NWPA timeframe.For example, in the 18-month period following submission of the licenseapplication, the current schedule calls for the NRC staff to review theapplication, to prepare its Safety Evaluation Report, and to evaluate andrespond to contentions proffered by the parties in the hearing. The LSSfurnishes an important tool for the staff to use to ensure that its reviewis both timely and comprehensive, and will enable the Staff to completeits review of both contested and uncontested issues without having an impacton the schedule of the adjudication.NCAI, commenting on the full text search capability of the LSS, stated_<ITAG tagnum="21">The most important aspect of that access is the proposed full-textsearch capability of the LSS. That is where the nuclear industry's alternative,a microfiche-based system, falls far short of what is needed. The nuclearindustry would implement an electronic index only to the relevant information,which would be stored and provided in microfiche form. Unfortunately, theusefulness of such systems is far too sensitive to the quality of the indexing.Particularly with respect to subject descriptors or abstracts, there needsto be near-perfect correspondence between the thought processes of theindexer and those of the subsequent searcher in order for the latter tofind materials in an index-only system.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Full-text search, on the other hand, provides much greater power andflexibility in accessing relevant information. Surveys cited by the NRCstaff in support of the LSS rulemaking consistently showed greater accuracyand efficiency of searching in full-text plus header systems_such as isenvisioned for the LSS_relative to other alternatives.</ITAG>As noted by the State of Nevada in its review of the industry proposal,the system the industry recommends_<ITAG tagnum="20">would not more greatly assist the Commission in meeting its congressionaltime goals, and would not provide the parties with effective and efficientdocument discovery. Most importantly, it would not give the Commissionthe commensurate higher level of confidence that all issues have been fullyexplored and that the public health and safety will be protected beforethe Commission arrives at its construction authorization decision.</ITAG>Furthermore, the State of Nevada believes that the industry microfichealternative ``fail[s] to take into account the fact that any other system,either hard copy or the microfiche based system which they [the industry]espouse, would be as labor intensive, potentially more time consuming,probably unwieldy, and more likely than not would involve as much costas the proposed LSS.'' For example, a microfiche data base would have tobe duplicated for each potential party as well as for each public documentroom. The latter, in particular, would require substantial additional physicalspace and personnel to oversee the microfiche library.The DOE benefit-cost analysis was only projected over a ten year periodbecause that period corresponds to the period where the major costs ofsystem design and development, and document entry, as well as the benefitsof the LSS, will be realized, i.e., from the pre-license application phaseto the decision on the construction authorization. Although, the projectedcosts were expressed in 1988 dollars, so were the expected benefits. Therefore,the conclusions of the analysis would be the same whether in constant oradjusted dollars. Finally, the Commission does not agree with the industrystatement that the LSS is a ``revolutionary'' system. There are many successfulcommercial information management systems such as Dialog, LEXIS, and Westlawthat provide full text search and retrieval of millions of pages. The U.S.Congress also has a data base (SCORPIO) that contains substantial legislativematerial in searchable full text. Seventy percent of the $200 million cost for the LSS is for the labor associatedwith assembling and organizing the documents, converting them to electronicformat, and preparing bibliographic headers. However, much of the costassociated with these activities will be incurred, in any event, as partof the records management function for the repository, including the costsfor checking the document conversion for completeness and accuracy. Therefore,the Commission does not believe that the $200 million cost accurately representsthe incremental cost attributable to the full text search capability ofthe LSS. Rather, the $200 million includes costs that would be incurredin any system of records selected by the agency for storing and retrievingdocuments pertinent to the HLW proceeding. In addition, the LSS cost projections are sensitive to the actual volumeof information to be entered and to the processing costs per page. Significantcost reductions may be achieved through competitive procurement of dataentry services. Cost reductions may also be realized by scaling down theuniverse of documents to be entered into the LSS, as discussed below. Inlight of the fact that the elimination of even one year of licensing delayby use of the LSS would result in a savings of approximately $200 million,the cost of the LSS is reasonable. In addition, the projected $200 millioncost over ten years is less than three percent of the total annual DOEbudget for the high-level waste program. <T3>Topical Guidelines. </T3>Several of the comments, explicitly or implicitly,addressed the size of the data base that would result from the use of thetopical guidelines for determining what documents must go into the LSS.One commenter, the former NRC trial counsel, recommended that reasonablelimits be established on the scope of document production, for example,excluding documents concerning alternative sites or limiting the documentsto those produced after the 1982 enactment of the NWPA, or to an earlierdate when the primary research and development work being relied on byDOE was completed. According to this commenter, meaningful limits on documentproduction should reduce the cost of, and the potential for delay in theuse of, the LSS; and such limits may well provide the type of alternativesought by Commissioner Roberts. Limitation of the topical guidelines tothe Yucca Mountain site was also recommended by another industry commenter.This commenter also recommended that the scope of documents should be furtherlimited to the documents supporting a license application. The topical guidelines were partially modeled after the Environmental Assessmentsprepared in connection with the DOE site selection process. The topicalguidelines are necessarily broad, reflecting a concern by several participantson the negotiating committee that documents related to potential licensingissues not be excluded from the LSS until the Commission determined whatwould be the permissible scope of substantive licensing issues. As notedby the Commission in the Supplementary Information to the proposed rule,the topical guidelines will <T3>not </T3>be used for the purpose of determining the scope of contentionsthat can be offered in the HLW proceeding under andSection; 2.1014. Participantson the negotiating committee fully agreed with this statement. As noted,their concern was to ensure that documents on <T3>potential </T3>licensing issues were not <T3>prematurely </T3>excluded. The Commission is sympathetic to the need for excluding material that isnot relevant to the licensing of the likely candidate site for the repository.Inasmuch as the existing scope of the topical guidelines (many of which<T3>are </T3>specifically limited to the Yucca Mountain site) was developedas part of the consensus process on the entire rulemaking, the staff believesthat a reduction in scope should be discussed by the negotiating committeeor its successor. The Topical Guidelines are not cast in stone. They areto be set forth as a Regulatory Guide developed by the NRC staff, ratherthan as part of the regulations themselves, and thus are to be accordedlesser status and legal effect. The Topical Guidelines set forth laterin this Supplementary Information are interim guidelines to be used untila more precise set is issued in an NRC Regulatory Guide. In either case,the Commission would again emphasize that the topical guidelines will notbe used for determining the scope of admissible contentions in the HLWlicensing proceeding.  Morever, there are other possibilities for ensuring that the document productionrequirements do not become unwieldy. The rulemaking on the Commission'sNEPA responsibilities will specify many of the areas that will be outsidethe scope of the hearing. After this rulemaking is finalized, the Commissioncould amend the topical guidelines accordingly. Until these issues areresolved, the identification and loading of selected categories of documentscould be postponed. In effect, priority would be given to the identificationand loading of documents directly relevant to the Yucca Mountain site,DOE contractor reports, or documents generated after DOE began investigationsat Yucca Mountain. The Supplementary Information to the proposed LSS rulestated that the LSS Advisory Review Panel may develop recommendations tothe Commission on whether particular categories of documentary material(e.g., those limited by date or subject) should still be included withinthe topical guidelines. The NRC LSS Internal Steering Committee will developa list of priorities, as well as potential amendments to the topical guidelines,in preparation for discussion with the other affected participants. On a final point, the Commission disagrees with the commenter that recommendedlimiting the data base to only documents supporting the license application.This would eliminate many of the documents available through the existingdiscovery process, thereby depriving parties of documents that they wouldnormally have access to under the Commission's current rules. More important,it would deny DOE and the NRC staff comparable electronic access to theexpected numerous technical documents prepared by Nevada's contractorson which the state will base its case.<T3>Non-LSS Provisions. </T3>In addition to the provisions in the proposedrule that concerned the development and implementation of the LSS, thefinal rule also contains several revisions to the rules of practice thatare not directly related to the LSS, but which should also provide fora more streamlined licensing process than the current licensing procedures.However, the Commission is committed to do everything it can to streamlineits licensing process and at the same time conduct a thorough safety reviewof the Department of Energy's application to construct a high-level wasterepository. The negotiators to this rulemaking have made a number of improvementsto our existing procedures. However, more improvements may be necessaryif the Commission is to meet the tight licensing deadline established bythe Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982, as amended. By publishing this rule,the Commission is not ruling out further changes to its rules of practice,including further changes to the rules contained in the negotiated rulemaking.The industry comments on the proposed rule contained several additionalrecommendations in this area. These same recommendations were also includedin a memorandum that the industry originally presented to the negotiatingcommittee on the LSS rule. Many of these recommendations were addressedby the negotiating committee and incorporated into the proposed LSS rule,although not always in the exact form proposed by the industry. The revisionsto the rules of practice proposed in the industry comments on the LSS ruleare those revisions that were not fully adopted by the negotiating committee.The industry recommendations are as follows_ andbullet; Establish a new threshold for contentions. According to the industry``NRC adjudicatory decisions have allowed the admission of contentionswith no foundation and no semblance of factual support.'' Accordingly,the industry recommends that the NRC require that a party demonstrate thatthere is a genuine and substantial issue of disputed fact requiring a hearingfor its resolution. This issue received extensive consideration by thenegotiating committee. Many of the participants on the committee did notagree that the industry position reflected NRC practice since 1980, nordid they believe that a higher standard for contentions was necessary toexclude ``frivolous issues,'' particularly in light of the early availabilityof information through the LSS. Furthermore, although the final LSS ruledoes not include the standard proposed by the industry, the final ruledoes require that the petition for intervention include a party's contentions,which must refer with particularity to the specific documentary materialor absence thereof that provides the basis for the contention, and thespecific regulatory or statutory requirement to which the contention isrelevant. This provides a basis on which to reject clearly frivolous contentions.Moreover, contentions which rely on incorrect facts can be tested throughexisting summary dispostion procedures at the outset of the hearing. As part of its efforts on regulatory reform, the Commission issued a proposedrule on July 3, 1986, that would amend certain provisions of its rulesof practice, 51 FR 24365. The draft final rule on regulatory reform addressesstandards for the admission of contentions, the elimination of unnecessarydiscovery against the NRC staff, the use of cross-examination plans, andthe timing of motions for summary disposition. Section 2.1000 of the LSSrule cross-references any sections of general applicability in subpartG of Part 2 that will continue to apply to the HLW licensing proceeding.As such, all but one of the provisions in the draft final regulatory reformrule (Section 2.714, which requires contentions to show that a genuinedispute exists on an issue of law, fact, or policy), if adopted, will automaticallyapply to the HLW proceeding. The LSS rule contains a new provision on contentions,Section 2.1014, and consequently Section 2.714 would no longer apply tothe HLW proceeding. The Commission intends to further evaluate the needto extend the ``genuine issue of fact'' standard to the HLW proceedingafter its review of this provision in the draft final regulatory reformrule. andbullet; Late contentions. The industry comments state that current NRCpractice is ``overly liberal in admitting contentions filed after the periodfor initial definition of contentions.'' The industry recommends that anew standard be established which would require an evidentiary showingthat: (1) There is significant new information which would require a modificationin facility design/construction to protect the public health and safety;and (2) such modification would substantially enhance such protection byimproving overall safety. The industry fails to substantiate its charge that the adjudicatory boardsare too liberal in admitting late contentions. A review of all such decisionssince 1980 reveals that less than 25 percent of late contentions have beenadmitted. Of those, the great majority were based on very special circumstancesand thus understandably admitted (e.g., new TMI-accident-related regulatoryrequirements, prior unavailability of emergency plans, discovery of potentiallyserious safety and quality assurance problems.) Thus, the industry's premiseis unsupported. Nonetheless, the negotiating committee deliberations onthis issue resulted in new standards for certain types of late contentions.Any petitions to amend or add contentions made more than forty days afterthe issuance of the NRC Staff Safety Evaluation Report (SER) must include,in addition to the usual factors for late-filed contentions, a showingthat the contention involves a significant safety or environmental issueor raises a material issue related to the performance evaluation anticipatedby 10 CFR 60.112 or 60.113. andbullet; Discovery. Citing as an example the local rules of only one federaldistrict court (out of 101) the industry proposed that limitations be placedon the number of depositions and the time period during which those depositionsmay be taken. Section 2.1018 of the final rule, and the model schedulein the Supplementary Information of the final rule already limit depositiondiscovery to approximately 21-months. The Board is also authorized by therules to prevent abuse of the discovery process. Further restrictions ondeposition discovery were given extensive consideration during the negotiation.The magnitude of this proceeding and the need for meaningful public reviewof health and safety issues, however, make arbitrary limits on depositions,imposed by rule, inappropriate and unwarranted. The industry also states that the informal discovery provisions containedin andSection;2.1018(a)(1) of the final rule will enable a party to ``delugeDOE with informal requests for information not available in the LSS.''The informal discovery procedures represent a method to allow parties tothe hearing to obtain the type of information normally gathered throughinterrogatories (names of witnesses, nature of testimony, etc.) througha less onerous and less time-consuming method than the use of written interrogatories.As such, it will be confined to a narrower band of information than impliedin the industry comment. Abuse of the informal discovery process can alsobe prevented by the Pre-License Application Licensing Board or the HearingLicensing Board under andSection;2.1018(c) of the final rule. However, inorder to minimize the potential for abuse of the informal discovery process,andSection;2.1018(a)(1) has been revised to include examples of the typeof material that will be available through informal discovery. andbullet; Intervention. According to the industry, the Commission ``hasallowed its licensing boards to grant intervention status to parties thatfailed to meet judicial standing requirements.'' According to the industrythis ``discretionary intervention'' tends to ``add additional parties tothe proceeding, does not serve the public interest, complicates pre-hearingprocedures, and should be removed.'' The Commission does not agree thatdiscretionary intervention ``does not serve the public interest'' or ``complicatespre-hearing procedures,'' and recommends against removing such discretionfrom the licensing boards. The Commission's licensing boards do followjudicial standards for intervention. However, the Commission does allowdiscretionary intervention under certain circumstances, and has establishedspecific factors to guide a licensing board's determination on whetherdiscretionary intervention should be permitted. <T3>Portland General Electric Co. </T3>(Pebble Springs Nuclear Plant, Units1 and 2), CLI-76-27, 4 NRC 610, 616 (1976). Since <T3>Pebble Springs,</T3> discretionary intervention has been authorizedonly four times, and in one of those instances, the grant of interventionwas later vacated as moot. It is also worth noting that, because the industry'sinterest in the HLW proceeding is economic, it may not satisfy the Commission'straditional, judicial test for standing and thus might well have to relyon the <T3>Pebble Springs</T3> doctrine to participate in the proceeding. andbullet; Affirmative case on contentions. The industry recommends thatthe Commission require that a party sponsoring a contention present anaffirmative evidentiary case for that contention. Under NRC case law, anintervenor does have the burden of going forward, but may do so by eitherdirect evidence or by cross-examination, as to the issues raised by theintervenor's contentions. <T3>Philadelphia Electric Co.</T3> (Limerick Generating Station, Units1 and 2), ALAB-262, 1 NRC 163, 191 (1975). The Commission believes thatthis more substantive proposal, which is beyond the scope of the instantrulemaking, warrants further consideration later, at the same time theCommission addresses the related issue of whether the threshold of contentionsshould be raised. andbullet; Seriatim hearings. The industry recommends that the Commissiondirect the licensing board to resolve contentions on an ongoing basis andthat internal agency appeals for these decisions need not await resolutionof the last group of issues. As noted above, the proposed LSS rule alreadydramatically alters existing practice by <T3>requiring</T3> (rather than prohibiting) appeals from certain typesof interlocutory orders, such as rulings on the admissibility and amendmentof contentions and motions for summary disposition, to be filed withinten days (rather than at the conclusion of the proceeding). See andSection;2.1015. Further, under long established agency precedent, rulings disposingof a major segment of a case are immediately appealable. <T3>Negotiating Committee Review. </T3>The State of Nevada, the NationalCongress of American Indians, and Lincoln County, Nevada submitted writtencomments on the public comment letters. The State of Nevada supports theLSS rule as proposed. According to the State, ``[t]he rule is the productof a very successful negotiation process, during which all major interests,except the utilities, engaged in significant compromises. The give andtake resulted in a proposed electronic discovery and motions practice systemwhich will enhance the parties' ability to fully inform the hearing panel,and thus the Commission, on the difficult issues involved in licensinga repository. It will therefore assist in meeting the Commission's ultimatehealth and safety responsibility.'' Furthermore, the State is convincedthat the proposed rule will provide a greater possibility that the Commissioncan meet its congressional time goals, or at least reduce the time whichwould be necessary to reach a construction authorization decision thanby using either traditional hard-copy discovery, or the industry's proposedmicrofiche based system. The State also emphasized that it had ``agreedto relinquish traditional hard copy discovery rights, and in return receivedwhat we are confident is a vehicle which will allow for a more enhanceduse of discovery, and thus a more effective means of participating in thelicensing process, and assisting the Commission in fulfilling it[s] ultimateresponsibility; that is, a construction authorization decision based ona full and complete airing of all of the complex and novel technical issues* * *.''.The National Congress of American Indians continues to support the LSS,because the benefits to be derived_primarily in the form of improved accessto program information_will greatly facilitate effective participationin the program on the part of Indian tribes and other potential intervenors.The cost of the system, while high, is justified by the benefits and isan insignificant fraction of overall nuclear waste program costs. NCAIsupports the conclusion of the Department of Energy and the NRC Staff thatthe LSS will significantly shorten the time required to license a repository.Furthermore, NCAI_<ITAG tagnum="20">reaffirmed its commendation of the Commission for undertaking thisrulemaking by negotiation and for including NCAI to represent nationalIndian interests in that negotiation. The result of the lengthy negotiationprocess necessarily represents a great deal of compromise on the part ofall the parties. We do not like every aspect of the draft rule, but wecertainly understand the rule and its derivation infinitely better thanwe would had we not been able to participate so thoroughly in its initialdrafting. All those representing intervenor interests yielded on many pointsin the negotiations to accommodate the positions of the nuclear industry.We would not have done so in any case if we had known that the industryultimately would not yield to accommodate the LSS concept as a whole. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The same considerations which led the Commission to undertake thisrulemaking by negotiation_that the results of more thorough participationwould yield a better and ore acceptable draft rule_should similarly leadthe Commission to reject the nuclear industry's position in promulgatingthe final rule. The proposed system is admittedly elaborate and costly,but it promises to lead to more efficient and effective management of thevast quantity of information required for repository licensing and moremeaningful participation in this important government process. The Commissionshould not be overly reluctant to engage in a bit of information age pioneering,as this is unquestionably the direction in which information managementin complex government regulation and litigation is going. The costs arenot out of line relative to overall program costs.</ITAG>Lincoln County, one of the members of the Nevada local government coalitionon the negotiating committee noted that_<ITAG tagnum="21">The utilities appear to be requesting rulemaking and other administrativerelief to expedite licensing in a manner which may jeopardize the fulland effective participating rights of potentially affected parties. TheNWPA provision calling for a three-year licensing period was enough ofa time concession for the utilities. Any further concessions for the sakeof expediency may cause harm to the balance of affected parties.</ITAG><T3>Coordination. </T3>On January 11, 1989, the Commission voted to establishan independent Office of the LSS Administrator reporting to the Commissionfor policy direction, and to the Chairman for day-to-day management supervision.In addition, the Commission renamed the current NRC LSS Negotiating Teamas the NRC LSS Internal Steering Committee effective immediately. The SteeringCommittee is to serve as the focal point within the Commission to identify,develop, and coordinate internal requirements and procedures, and to representNRC's interests in the LSS. In order to carry out these responsibilities,and to prepare for coordination with DOE on the design and developmentof the LSS, the Steering Committee has begun the preparation of a draftLSS implementation plan. The plan will address the following_andbullet; Identification and prioritization of the LSS design and developmentissues that need to be addressed with DOE; andbullet; Identification and prioritization of the issues that need to beaddressed for implementation of the LSS within the NRC, including a delineationof the role of the LSS Administrator vis-a-vis the Steering Committee andthe affected NRC Offices; andbullet; Preparation of a draft Memorandum of Understanding between NRCand DOE that would delineate the responsibilities of the respective agenciesin regard to the LSS; andbullet; Preparation of a draft charter for the LSS Advisory Committee;andbullet; A schedule for implementation of the plan; andbullet; Proposed amendments to the topical guidelines.The Commission would emphasize that, in order to accomplish the LSS objectives,DOE must have the LSS operational as far in advance of the submission ofthe license application as feasible. The Commission is somewhat concernedover the DOE statement in its comment on the proposed rule that_<ITAG tagnum="21">The January 1991 date cited for availability of the Licensing SupportSystem * * * is no longer a realistic date. Based on the findings of thepreliminary design effort to date and on the best available estimates ofan anticipated schedule of procurement for system hardware and softwarecomponents, elements of the system will be available in late 1992, withcomprehensive capabilities now estimated to be available in early 1993.</ITAG>The Commission realizes that the schedule for submission of the DOE licenseapplication may also be delayed beyond the 1995 date now anticipated byDOE. However, until such a schedule adjustment is an actuality, DOE, withthe assistance of NRC and the other affected parties, must make their bestefforts to see that the LSS is operational as soon as practicable beforethe license application is submitted. In this regard, DOE, NRC, and otherparties subject to the rule must now begin preparation for compliance withthe document submission requirements in andSection; 2.1003. Furthermore,the LSS Administrator's evaluation of DOE compliance, pursuant to andSection;2.1003(h)(2), begins six months after his or her appointment.<ITAG tagnum="74">Additional Views of Commissioner Curtiss</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For a number of reasons, discussed in more detail below, I have significantreservations about proceeding at this point with the so-called ``non-LSS''portion of this rule, wherein the Negotiating Committee has recommendedextensive changes to our Part 2 procedures, as those procedures will applyto the Department of Energy's application for a construction authorizationfor the high-level waste repository.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">First, it does not appear to me that the original charge to the NegotiatingCommittee envisioned that the Committee would address, in a wide-rangingmanner, the so-called Part 2 procedural provisions that will govern thehigh-level waste proceeding, except to the extent that changes in theseprovisions proved to be necessary for the purpose of implementing the LicensingSupport System (LSS). The rule before us includes a number of provisionsthat are necessary to implement the LSS; but it also includes a numberof ``non-LSS'' provisions that are unrelated to the LSS and that, in myjudgment, go far beyond the scope of the Committee's charge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Second, we have not had a sufficient opportunity to reflect upon the``non-LSS'' procedural changes that have been proposed_to ensure that theprocedures are clear and ambiguous and to reach a decision as to whether,as a matter of policy, the approach reflected in the proposed proceduresshould be endorsed. My own view is that there is considerable ambiguity,reflected in part by the apparent lack of consensus on key issues thatemerged in the February 7, 1989 Commission meeting, about the meaning ofcertain important provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Third, my concerns in this regard have been heightened by the responsesthat we recently received from the Negotiating Committee members to thequestions that I posed on February 24, 1989. In short, with the exceptionof the Industry Coalition, the Negotiating Committee members and the leadconvenor and facilitator have individually declined to answer the questions,suggesting that inquiries about the purpose and intent of this rule somehowthreaten the integrity of the negotiating process and will lead to thecollapse of whatever consensus has been achieved.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In posing these questions, it was not my intent to plow new groundor raise new issues that go beyond the topics that are addressed in theproposed rule recommended by the Negotiating Committee in SECY-89-027.Indeed, in every instance, the questions concern the purpose, the intent,and the meaning of the procedural provisions contained <T3>within the four corners of this rulemaking package</T3> and involvematters that, in my judgment, need to be clarified if our objective hereis to have a rational, well-understood set of procedures to govern thehigh-level waste adjudicatory proceeding. If these matters were discussedand addressed by the Negotiating Committee_and a consensus achieved_thenthe response should require no further negotiation. A simple referenceto the text of the rule or to the minutes of the negotiations would suffice.On the other hand, if these matters did not receive the attention of theNegotiating Committee_or a consensus does not exist_then in my judgmentthat should give us pause about proceeding with changes that are not clearlyunderstood. If we have any hope of meeting the three-year statutory schedulefor the high-level waste proceeding, I think we should clear up these ambiguitiesnow.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Whether a consensus was achieved or not, we are nevertheless entitledto a response from the Negotiating Committee about the purpose and intentof the rule that has been proposed for our consideration. We are ill-servedby the Negotiating Committee's inability or unwillingness to respond toreasonable questions about the meaning and purpose of key provisions inthis rule.\1\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Indeed, the position taken by the Negotiating Committeein response to the questions that have been posed about the purpose andintent of the rule leads me to question the wisdom of relying on the negotiatedrulemaking process for future rulemaking initiatives.<ITAG tagnum="21">Fourth and finally, there are a number of procedural changes thatgo beyond, or involve changes in, what the Negotiating Committee has proposedthat warrant consideration (<T3>see, e.g., </T3>Memorandum from Christine N. Kohl to William C. Parler,January 19, 1989; SECY-89-023, ``Consideration of Revisions to the Commission'sRules of Practice in Order to Further Streamline the High-Level Waste LicensingProcess'', January 26, 1989). I am pleased that these additional changeswill be coming to the Commission shortly for our consideration and I hopethat we can move forward expeditiously with our deliberations on theseadditional changes. But it seems to me that it would be far preferableto make these changes all at one time and in a single package, where wecan consider the policy matters related to our HLW procedures in a comprehensiveand coordinated way, rather than through the bifurcated approach that weare now taking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the foregoing reasons, I would disapprove the ``non-LSS'' provisionsof the rule (sections 2.1014-2.1023, 2.714, 2.722, 2.743, and 2.764, aswell as the topical guidelines and the model timeline). I would approvethose provisions of the rule that are directly related to implementationof the LSS (2.1000-2.1013).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">The Final Rule</ITAG>The final rule adds a new Subpart J to 10 CFR Part 2 setting forth theprocedures that govern the Commission's HLW licensing proceeding, includingthe use of the LSS for the submission and management of documents in theproceeding. The final rule applies only to the HLW proceeding, and doesnot apply to licensing involving any other type of facility or activitylicensed by the Commission. The rule will be applicable to all partiesto the HLW licensing proceeding regardless of whether a particular partywas a member of the negotiating committee. No substantive changes havebeen made to the rule as proposed.Section 2.1000 Scope of SubpartThe final rule establishes a new Subpart J in 10 CFR Part 2 setting forththe procedures that govern the Commission's HLW licensing proceeding, includingthe use of the LSS for the submission and management of documents in theproceeding. Generally, the procedures in the new Subpart take precedenceover the provisions of general applicability in 10 CFR Subpart G. However,andSection;2.1000 cross-references any sections of general applicabilityin Subpart G that will continue to apply to the HLW licensing proceeding.The final rule applies only to the HLW proceeding, and does not apply tolicensing proceedings for any other type of facility or activity licensedby the Commission. The rule will be applicable to all parties to the HLWlicensing proceeding regardless of whether a particular party was a memberof the negotiating committee.Section 2.1001 DefinitionsSection 2.1001 sets forth the definitions of terms used throughout SubpartJ. These definitions will be discussed with the relevant sections of thefinal rule.Section 2.1002 High-level Waste Licensing Support SystemSection 2.1002 describes the purpose and scope of the LSS. The LSS is intendedto provide full text search capability of, or easy access to, the ``documentarymaterial'' of DOE, NRC, other parties to the LHW licensing proceeding;government entities participating in the HLW proceeding as ``interestedgovernmental participants'' under 10 CFR 2.715(c); persons who qualifyas ``potential parties'' under andSection;2.1008; and their contractors (``parties,''``interested governmental participants,'' and ``potential parties,'' willbe collectively referred to hereinafter as ``LSS participants''). LSS participantsmust ensure that their contractors, consultants, grantees, or other agents,comply with the applicable requirements of Subpart J.For the purposes of the information that will in the LSS, ``documentarymaterial'' means any material or other information generated by or in thepossession of an LSS participant that is relevant to, or likely to leadto the discovery of information that is relevant to, the licensing of thelikely candidate site for a geologic repository. The identification ofmaterial that is within the universe of ``relevant to, or likely to leadto the discovery of information that is relevant to, the licensing of thelikely candidate site for a geologic repository'' will be determined bythe topical guidelines set forth in this Supplementary Information. Indetermining which <T3>documents</T3> must be placed in the LSS by a LSS participant, thedocument must fall within the definition of ``documentary material'' inandSection;2.1001, i.e., it must be relevant to, or likely to lead to informationthat is relevant to, the licensing of the likely candidate for a geologicrepository. Therefore, a document must not only fall within the topicalguidelines, but also have a nexus to a geologic repository. It is alsothe Commission's intent to issue these topical guidelines as an NRC RegulatoryGuide. The topical guidelines set forth later in this supplementary informationare interim guidelines to be used until a more precise set is issued inan NRC regulatory guide. The Commission expects all LSS participants tomake a good faith effort to identify the documentary material within thescope of andSection;2.1003. However, a rule of reason must be applied toan LSS participant's obligation to identify all documentary material withinthe scope of the topical guidelines. For example, DOE will not be expectedto make an exhaustive search of its archival material that conceivablemight be within the topical guidelines but has not been reviewed or consultedin any way in connection with DOE's work on its license application. Itis also anticipated that the LSS Advisory Review Panel established pursuantto andSection;2.1011(e), in evaluating the implementation of the LSS, maymake occasional recommendations to the Commission on whether particularcategories of documentary material (e.g., those limited by date or subject)should be included within the topical guidelines.Although the topical guidelines will guide the selection of relevant informationfor entry into the LSS, they will not be used for the purpose of determiningthe scope of contentions that can be offered in the HLW proceeding underproposed andSection;2.1014. The scope of contentions will be governed bythe Commission's authority under relevant statutes and regulations.Section 2.1002(d) specifies that Subpart J is not intented to affect anyindependent right of a potential party, interested governmental participant,or party to receive information or documents. These independent rightsconsists of statutory rights under such statutes as the Freedom of InformationAct (FOIA), or the Nuclear Waste Policy Act, as amended, or rights derivedfrom grant requirements such as those between DOE and the State of Nevada.Section 2.1003 Submission of Material to the LSSSection 2.1003 sets forth the requirements for the submission of documentarymaterial by LSS participants to the LSS Administrator for entry into theLSS. LSS participants, excluding DOE and NRC, must submit an ASCII file,a bibliographic header, and an image for all documents generated by theLSS participant or its contractor after the LSS participant gains accessto the LSS pursuant to either andSection;2.1008 or andSection; 2.1014. Submissionof these documents must be made reasonably contemporaneous with their creation.For documents generated or acquired before the LSS participant gains accessto the LSS, the LSS participant need only submit a header and an imagefor each document. The LSS Administrator will be responsible for enteringthese documents into the LSS in searchable full text. DOE and NRC, thegenerators of the largest volumes of documentary material, will be responsiblefor submitting to the LSS Administrator ASCII files, bibliographic headersand images of documents within the scope of the topical guidelines. Theformat criteria for the submission and acceptance of ASCII, images, andheaders will be initially established by DOE in concert with the LSS AdvisoryCommittee established pursuant to proposed andSection;2.1011(e)(2), to belater supplemented as necessary by the LSS Administrator in concert withthe LSS Advisory Review Panel.The submission requirements of andSection;2.1003 generally apply only tofinal documents, e.g., a document bearing the signature of an employeeof an LSS participant or its contractors. However, paragraphs (a) and (b)of andSection;2.1003 also require the submission of ``circulated drafts''for entry into the LSS. A ``circulated draft'' means a nonfinal documentcirculated for supervisory concurrence or signature and in which the originalauthor or others in the concurrence process have non-concurred. The intentof this exception to the general rule or final documents is to capturethose documents to which there has been an unresolved objection by theauthor or other person in the internal management review process (the concurrenceprocess) of an LSS participant or its contractor. In effect, the Commissionand other government agencies who are LSS participants are waiving theirdeliberative process privilege for these circulated drafts. The objectionor non-concurrence must be unresolved. Any draft documents to which sucha formal, unresolved objection exists must be submitted for entry intothe LSS. Although many of the LSS participants or their contractors donot have the same type of concurrence process as DOE and NRC, the Commissionexpects all LSS participants to make a good faith effort to apply the intentof this provision to their document approval process.The requirement applies regardless of whether any final document ultimatelyemerges from the LSS participant's decision-making process. A determinationnot to issue a final document, or allowing a substantial period of timeto elapse with no action being taken to issue a final document, shall bedeemed to be the completion of the decision-making process. If a decisionis made not to finalize a document to which there has been an objection,the draft of that document must be entered into the LSS after the decision-makingprocess on the document has been completed, i.e., the requirements of andSection;2.1003do not require a LSS participant to submit a circulated draft to the LSSwhile the internal decision-making process is ongoing. In addition, underandSection;2.1006(c), circulated drafts that are subject to withholding undera privilege or exception other than the deliberative process privilege(e.g., attorney work product), are not required to be submitted for entryin searchable full text to the LSS under andSection;2.1003.As a general rule, all documentary material is to be in the LSS in searchablefull text. However, the rule provides for exceptions to this general rule.Section 2.1003(c) addresses graphic-oriented documentary material thatis not appropriate for entry into the Licensing Support System in searchablefull text. Graphic-oriented documentary material is material that is printed,scripted, handwritten, or otherwise displayed in hard copy form, and iscapable of being captured in electronic image by a digital scanning device.Graphic-oriented material includes raw data, computer runs, computer programsand codes, field notes, laboratory notes, maps, and photographs which havebeen printed, scripted, handwritten or otherwise displayed in any hardcopy form and which, while capable of being captured in electronic imageby a digital scanning device, may be captured and submitted to the LSSAdministrator in any form of image, along with a bibliographic header.Section 2.1003(c) also addresses documentary material that is not suitablefor entry into the Licensing Support System in either image or searchablefull text. Such material shall be described in the Licensing Support Systemby a sufficiently descriptive bibliographic header. The timeframe for entryof graphic-oriented material, or material that is not suitable for entryin either image or searchable full text, will be established pursuant tothe access protocols in andSection;2.1011(d)(10). In addition, submissionof images will be determined by the protocols on digitizing equipment establishedby the LSS Advisory Review Panel. However, in any case, this type of documentarymaterial must be entered into the LSS after the principal investigatordecides that the data are in a usable form, including the completion ofquality assurance procedures. The access protocol should ensure that anycollection or ``package'' of documentary material, as the term is usedin andSection;2.1003(c)(3), which relates to a study, should be submittedreasonably contemporaneous with the completion of such a ``package,'' includingany quality assurance that may be required.Section 2.1005 sets forth categories of documents that are to be completelyexcluded from the LSS, and andSection;2.1006 sets forth the categories ofdocuments that may be withheld from entry into the LSS on the basis ofa privilege or exception. The details of these provisions will be discussedbelow. To ensure that progress is made in designing, developing and loading theLSS, andSection;2.1003(h) provides for evaluations of DOE compliance withthe requirements of andSection;2.1003 at six month intervals. The DOE licenseapplication cannot be docketed under Subpart J, thus losing the benefitsof Subpart J, unless the LSS Administrator certifies at least six monthsbefore the license application is submitted that DOE is in substantialcompliance with the provisions of the Subpart. Although andSection;2.1003(h)(1)requires the certification decision six months before submission of theDOE license application, the Commission anticipates that the LSS participantswill have access to the LSS well before the license application is submitted.The LSS Administrator's decision on DOE compliance may be reviewed by thePre-License Application Licensing Board established pursuant to andSection;2.1010,if the Board receives a properly filed petition. Under andSection;2.1003(a)(2) and (b)(2), LSS participants are required to submit any documentarymaterial generated or acquired before the LSS participant is given accessto the LSS (``backlog''), no later than six months before the license applicationfor the repository is submitted. However, the Commission encourages LSSparticipants to submit this material for entry as soon as possible afterthey have been given access to the LSS.In the event that the LSS Administrator cannot certify DOE compliance withSubpart J, DOE may either postpone the filing of the application untilcompliance is certified, or can file the license application for docketingunder 10 CFR Part 2, Subpart G. In the latter event, the Commission wouldnote that it will be unlikely to meet the three year NWPA timeframe fora decision on the issuance of a construction authorization, in the eventof a contested adjudicatory proceeding. Although DOE may ultimately comeinto compliance with the provisions of Subpart J at some point after thelicense application has been docketed under Subpart G, the Commission maystill not be able to certify that the statutory timeframe will be met.However, andSection;2.1003(h)(3)(ii) does authorize the Commission to specifythe extent to which Subpart J will apply if DOE later comes into compliance.The Commission is optimistic that the effective implementation of the ruleproposed in this notice will allow the Commission to meet the scheduleset forth in section 114(d) of the NWPA.Section 2.1004 Amendments and AdditionsThis section provides for the addition to, and amendment of, records submittedby the LSS participants. The submitter has sixty days to verify whethera document has been entered correctly in the pre-license application phase,and five days to verify correct entry after the license appplication hasbeen submitted. Any errors in entry discovered during the sixty and fiveday periods may be corrected by the submitter. After the time period forverification has run, any errors may not be corrected by revising the originaldocument. Rather, the submitter must submit a corrected version to theLSS Administrator, with a separate bibliographic header. Both the bibliographicheader for the revised document and the original document must note thattwo versions of the document are in the LSS.Section 2.1004 also addresses the issue of updates of documents that arealready in the LSS. Updated pages must be submitted to the LSS Administratorfor entry as a separate document with a separate bibliographic header.The bibliographic header of the original document must specify that anupdate is available. All the pages in a particular update will be enteredas a single document.Section 2.1004 addresses amendments and additions to the documentary materialin the LSS. This section does not preclude the LSS Administrator from makingrevisions to headers necessary to maintain and enhance the usefulness ofthe header information. Such revisions would include the following_andbullet; Updating assigned subject index terms as the thesaurus is enhancedand expanded,andbullet; Where a field containing pointers to cross-reference related documentssubsequently added to the database must be updated,andbullet; Where the ability to annotate a document record to show lateruse(s) as exhibits to depositions and testimony may be required at a latertime.Section 2.1004(e) requires that any document that has been incorrectlyexcluded from the LSS must be submitted to the LSS Administrator for entrywithin two days of its identification by the LSS participant who is responsiblefor the submission of the document.Section 2.1005 ExclusionsSection 2.1005 establishes several categories of documents that do nothave to be entered into the LSS, either under the requirements of andSection;2.1003 or under the derivative discovery requirments of andSection; 2.1019.These exclusions include documents typically referred to as official noticematerial; reference books and text books; administrative materials suchas general distribution cover memoranda, budget, finance, personnel, andprocurement materials; press clippings and press releases; junk mail; andclassified material. The scope of work on a procurement related to repositorysiting, construction, or operation, or the transportation of spent nuclearfuel or high-level waste is not within the scope of these exclusions.Section 2.1006 PrivilegeThe submission of documents to the LSS is subject to the traditional privilegesfrom discovery recognized in NRC adjudicatory proceedings, as well as allthe exceptions from disclosure contained in 10 CFR 2.790 of the Commission'sregulations. These privileges and exceptions include the attorney-clientprivilege, the attorney work product privilege, the government's deliberativeprocess exemption, protection for privileged or confidential commercialor financial information, and the protection of safeguards information.The Pre-License Application Licensing Board, pursuant to andSection; 2.1010(b),will rule on any claims of withholding based on these privileges or exceptions.As in any NRC adjudicatory proceeding, the Board may rule that the releaseof privileged or excepted material is necessary to a proper decision inthe proceeding, or may order the disclosure of a document under a protectiveorder. Section 2.1006(a) extends the deliberative process privilege normallyavailable to federal government agencies to state and local governmentsand Indian Tribes. Safeguards information is to be protected under theprovisions of 10 CFR 73.21. Subpart I of 10 CFR Part 2 will govern theprotection and disclosure of any Restricted Data and National SecurityInformation during the proceeding. The existence of any material of thistype should be identified to the Licensing Board and the parties pursuantto 10 CFR 2.907 and is not subject to the requirements of andSection; 2.1003.Accordingly, no headers need be submitted for Subpart I information.Section 2.1007 AccessSection 2.1007 establishes the provisions for access to the LSS by thepublic and by LSS participants. In terms of public access, the NRC andDOE will provide public access terminals at their respective Public DocumentRooms at headquarters in Washington, DC, at NRC regional offices, and atvarious locations in the vicinity of the likely candidate site for therepository. In the pre-license application phase, access to the LSS throughthese public access terminals will consist of full text search capabilityof the full headers for documents in the LSS. The NRC and DOE Public DocumentRooms will provide access, consistent with current practice, to the papercopy or microfiche of the documents of that agency before access to theLSS is available (currently projected for January 1992). Once the LSS isoperational, public access to the LSS headers will be available withinthe same timeframe that the headers and LSS documents are available toLSS participants. In addition, copies of specific DOE or NRC documentsmay be requested under the procedures of the agencies' Public DocumentRooms and the FOIA regulations of the NRC, 10 CFR Part 9, or DOE, 10 CFRPart 1004. These regulations provide for a ten day response time to requests,10 CFR 9.25(e) and 10 CFR 1004.5(d)(1), and the waiver of copying feesto qualified persons, 10 CFR 9.39 and 10 CFR 1004.9(a). Public access tothe full text of all documents in the LSS, except for documents withheldfrom disclosure under section 2.1006, shall be provided after the noticeof hearing is issued for the HLW licensing proceeding. DOE and NRC willensure that adequate terminal access facilities are provided at the publicdocument rooms.Remote access to the LSS from individual computer facilities will be availableto LSS participants both during the pre-license application phase and afterthe notice of hearing has been issued. The cost of the computer facilityand the telephone connect charge must be borne by the LSS participant.However, they will not be assessed a central processing unit (CPU) chargefor access to the LSS. LSS participants will be able to file an electronicrequest for paper copies of LSS documents from their individual computerfacilities, and also will be able to file an electronic request for a feewaiver when requesting paper copies of documents in the LSS. This waiveris currently available to qualified persons or groups seeking a fee waiverfor copies of NRC documents who submit a written request to the Commissionunder the Commission's Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) regulations in10 CFR Part 9. The criteria in 10 CFR 9.39 would be used to determine ifthe requestor should be granted a fee waiver. Section 2.1007(c)(4) wouldauthorize the Commission to grant a generic fee waiver to a qualifyingLSS participant after the initial request for a fee waiver has been made.Documents in the LSS will not be considered NRC agency records solely byvirtue of the NRC being the LSS Administrator. However, any of those documentsthat were generated by or submitted to the NRC as part of the NRC's licensingresponsibility for the repository will be NRC agency records. As notedabove, documents considered agency records may be requested under a FOIArequest to the NRC. Similarly, DOE records may be requested from DOE undera FOIA request, and the records of any other governmental entity that maybe obligated to provide documents by virtue of a freedom of informationstatute (e.g., a State agency) may be requested. It is anticipated thatthe public availability of headers for LSS documents will facilitate freedomof information requests and responses. Section 2.1008 Potential Parties Section 2.1008 establishes the procedures for a person becoming a potentialparty during the pre-license application phase, thereby gaining accessto the LSS during this period. Upon a petition from an interested person,the Pre-License Application Licensing Board, established pursuant to andSection;2.1010,will determine in accordance with andSection;2.1008(c) if the person meetsthe criteria in andSection;2.1008(b). These criteria consist of the factorsfor determining intervention status under andSection;2.1014(c) or the criteriain 10 CFR 2.715 for interested governmental participation, both as evaluatedin reference to the topical guidelines set forth below. A grant of access to the LSS pursuant to andSection;2.1008 before an applicationis filed does not carry a presumption that a potential party will be admittedas a party after an application is filed under andSection;2.1014 or as aninterested governmental participant under 10 CFR 2.715. Although andSection;2.1014(c)(4)of the proposed rule provided that the Hearing Licensing Board would considerpre-license application access to the LSS as one factor in ruling on petitionsfor intervention, this provision has been deleted. Under andSection;2.1014(c),the Board must still consider the nature of the petitioner's right underthe Atomic Energy Act; the nature and extent of the petitioner's property,financial, or other interest in the proceeding; and the possible effectof any order that may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner'sinterest. Therefore, the Commission did not believe that pre-license applicationaccess would have any meaningful effect on the Board's determination onintervention petitions. It should be emphasized that a petitioner mustalso satisfy andSection;2.1014(a)(2) in regard to an admissible contentionin order to participate in the proceeding. An LSS participant's accessto the LSS obligates it to comply with the regulations in Subpart J, includingcompliance with all orders of the Pre-License Application Licensing Board.Section 2.1009 Procedures Section 2.1009 specifies the procedures each LSS participant must followto ensure implementation of the requirements in Subpart J, including establishingprocedures to ensure that documentary material is identified and submittedfor entry into the LSS. Each LSS participant must identify a specific individualas the LSS point-of-contact. This individual must certify, at six monthintervals, that all documentary material for which the LSS participantis responsible under this subpart has been identified and submitted tothe LSS. Section 2.1010 Pre-License Application Licensing BoardSection 2.1010 establishes an NRC Pre-License Application Licensing Boardto rule on requests for access to the LSS during the pre-license applicationphase, and to resolve disputes over the entry of documents and the developmentand implementation of the LSS by DOE and the LSS Administrator. The Boardwill be appointed six months before access to the LSS is scheduled to becomeavailable. The Board possesses the same general power as other NFC LicensingBoards possess under 10 CFR 2.718 and 10 CFR 2.721(d). In order to gainaccess to the LSS during the pre-license application phase, an LSS participantmust agree to comply with all orders of the Pre-License Application LicensingsBoard, and all LSS regulations. Practice before the PALB is essentiallya motions practice, akin to that during the normal discovery, pre-hearingphase in a Part 50 proceeding before a licensing board. Oral presentationsare not precluded, but rather will be left to the discretion of the board(as is now the case), depending on the nature of the dispute. See, forexample, andSection;andSection;2.1010 (d) and (e), 2.1015, and 2.1016.Section 2.1011 LSS Management and AdministrationSection 2.1011 establishes an LSS Administrator who will be responsiblefor managing, operating, and maintaining the LSS. Because the LSS willcontain in electronic form, the documentary material constituting the Commission'sdocket and official record for the repository licensing proceeding, andbecause use of the LSS will be an integral part of the Commission's adjudicatoryhearing on the license application, the NRC will serve as the LSS Administrator.In order to avoid any conflict-of-interest problems, the LSS Administratorcannot be any person or organizational unit that either represents theU.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission staff as a party to the high-level wastelicensing proceeding or a part of the management chain reporting to theDirector of the Office of Nuclear Material Safety and Safeguards. The Commissionhas decided to establish an independent Office of the LSS Administratorreporting to the Commission for policy direction and to the Chairman forday-to-day management supervision. The LSS Administrator (like other Commission-leveloffices) will report to the Commission for overall policy direction onall LSS matters <T3>except</T3> the certification of DOE compliance required by andSection;2.1033(h)(1).The LSS Administrator will make that determination <T3>on his/her own,</T3> subject to formal adjudicatory review (upon request)by the Pre-License Application Licensing Board (andSection;2.1010(a)(1)),the Appeal Board (andSection;2.1015(b)(i)), and, finally, the Commissionitself (andSection;2.1015(e)).On a related issue, with the exception of the Commission in its role asLSS Administrator (see the definition of ``LSS Administrator in andSection;2.1001),the LSS cannot reside in any computer system that is controlled by anyLSS participant, including its contractors, and cannot be physically locatedon the premises of any LSS participant or its contractors.The LSS is to be designed and developed by DOE consistent with the requirementsin Subpart J. This responsibility includes all procurement of hardwareand software. However, the design and development of the LSS by DOE mustbe undertaken in consultation with the LSS Administrator. After the LSShas been designed and becomes operational, all redesign and procurementby DOE must be with the concurrence of the LSS Administrator.Section 2.1011(e) provides for the establishment of an LSS Advisory ReviewPanel, which will be chartered under the Federal Advisory Committee Act,to advise DOE on the design and development of the LSS, and to advise theLSS Administrator on the implementation of the LSS. The LSS Administratorappoints the members of the Advisory Review Panel from members of the LicensingSupport System Advisory Committee established pursuant to andSection;2.1011(e)(2)within sixty days after the LSS Administrator has been designated. TheLicensing Support System Advisory Committee will be composed of the Stateof Nevada, the coalition of affected units of local government in Nevadathat served on the negotiating committee, DOE, NRC, the National Congressof American Indians, the coalition of national environmental groups thatserved on the negotiating committee, and other members as the Commissionmay designate pursuant to the balanced membership requirements of FACA.Because DOE is now in the process of designing the LSS, the Advisory ReviewPanel is not yet available to provide advice and recommendations to DOE.In the interim period between publication of the final rule and appointmentof the Advisory Review Panel by the LSS Administrator, the LSS AdvisoryCommitee will perform the functions of the Advisory Review Panel set forthin andSection;2.1011(e).It is the Commission's intent that, after the commencement of the hearing,the primary focus of the Advisory Review Panel will be on broad, long-term,technical issues. Any immediate problems with the functioning of the LSSduring the hearing will be addressed by the LSS Administrator or the HearingLicensing Board.It is anticipated that the DOE and NRC will enter into a Memorandum ofUnderstanding (MOU), consistent with the requirements of the rule, on thedesign and development of the LSS.Section 2.1011(d) sets forth the responsibilities of the LSS Administratorincluding providing the necessary personnel, materials, and services forthe operation and maintenance of the LSS, and entering the documentarymaterial submitted pursuant to section 2.1003 in searchable full text,as appropriate. Section 2.1012 ComplianceSection 2.1012 establishes provisions to ensure compliance with the requirementsof Subpart J, particularly the document submission requirements of andSection;2.1003.DOE may not submit the license application for docketing under SubpartJ unless the LSS Administrator certifies that DOE is in substantial andtimely compliance with andSection;2.1003. In addition, under andSection;2.1012(b)(1),no person may be granted party or interested governmental participant statusin the hearing if it is not in substantial and timely compliance with therequirements of andSection;2.1003. A person who is not in substantial andtimely compliance at the time specified for the submission of petitionsto intervene or to become an interested governmental participant, may latercome into compliance and be admitted to the hearing, assuming they meetall the other requirements in andSection;2.1014 or 10 CFR 2.715(c) for admission.However, persons admitted to the hearing under this provision must takethe proceeding as they find it. The Hearing Licensing Board will not entertainany requests from such a person to delay the proceeding in order for thatperson to compensate for time missed in the hearing. Section 2.1012(d)provides for the termination or suspension of an LSS participant's accessrights if it is in noncompliance with any applicable order of the Pre-LicenseApplication Licensing Board or the Hearing Licensing Board. However, anyloss of access under this section does not relieve an LSS participant ofits responsibilities in connection with the service of pleadings underandSection;2.1013 of this subpart.Section 2.1013 Use of LSS During Adjudicatory Proceeding Section 2.1013 establishes procedures for the electronic submission ofpleadings during the hearing, or during the pre-license application phasefor practice before the Pre-License Application Licensing Board under andSection;2.1010, for the electronic transmission of Board and Commission issuancesand orders, as well as for on-line access to the LSS during the hearing.Under andSection; 2.1013(a) the Secretary of the Commission maintains theofficial docket pursuant to the requirements of 10 CFR 2.702. In this regard,each potential party, party, or interested governmental participant mustsubmit a signed paper copy of each electronic adjudicatory filing to theSecretary. The staff would emphasize that section 2.1003 also applies tothe submission of pleadings during the hearing. Therefore, an ASC II file,a header, and an image of the pleading must also be submitted to the LSSAdministrator. The final rule gives the Secretary the flexibility to establishthe official docket in either hard copy or electronic form depending onthe details of LSS design and the records management requirements of theFederal Archives. Absent good cause, all exhibits tendered during the hearingmust have already been entered into the LSS prior to the commencement ofthat portion of the hearing where the exhibit is to be offered. Section 2.1014 Intervention Section 2.1014 establishes the standards for intervention in the HLW proceeding.Section 2.1014 incorporates several of the provisions currently in the10 CFR 2.714 general standards for intervention. Accordingly, any provisionsof andSection; 2.1014 that remain unchanged from the 10 CFR 2.714 provisionsare to be interpreted according to the existing practice. Section 2.1014(a)requires petitions for intervention and proposed contentions to be filedat the same time, as well as petitions to participate under andSection; 2.715(c)_bothwithin thirty days after the notice of hearing. In addition to the factorsnow in 10 CFR 2.714(a)(2), andSection; 2.1014(a)(2) requires the petitionto reference with particularity the specific documentary material, or absencethereof, that provides the basis for the contention, and the specific regulatoryor statutory requirement to which the contention is relevant. This codifiesexisting Commission practice in regard to contentions. Section 2.1014(a)(4) allows the adding or amending of contentions, includingcontentions based on the NRC Staff Safety Evaluation Report (SER). Contentionsadded or amended before the issuance of the SER will be evaluated accordingto the factors for nontimely filings in andSection; 2.1014(a)(1). Contentionsbased on information or issues raised in the SER must be made within fortydays after the issuance of the SER and will be evaluated according to thefactors in andSection; 2.1014(a)(1). The SER is to be issued within eighteenmonths after the license application is docketed. Any petitions to amendor add contentions made more than forty days after the issuance of theSER, in addition to the factors for nontimely filing in andSection; 2.1014(a)(1),must include a showing that the contention involves a significant safetyor environmental issue or raises a material issue related to the performanceevaluation anticipated by 10 CFR 60.112 or 10 CFR 60.113. In this context,``material'' may involve items that are material to demonstrating compliancewith andSection;andSection; 60.112 or 60.113 but which in and of themselvesmay not constitute a significant safety or environmental issue. Although andSection; 2.1014(a)(4) places some added restrictions on the amendingor adding of contentions compared to 10 CFR 2.714, the Commission believesthat the early availability of documents through access to the LSS willfacilitate the preparation of timely and better based contentions at theoutset of the proceeding, as compared to the traditional NRC licensingproceeding where contentions must be prepared without the benefit of priordiscovery. Section 2.1014(c) establishes the standards for permitting interventionin the HLW proceeding. Intervention is permitted as a matter of right byan affected unit of local government as defined in section 2(31) of theNWPA or by any affected Indian Tribe as defined in 10 CFR Part 60 of theCommission's regulations. The State of Nevada, like DOE or the NRC, isautomatically a party to the HLW proceeding, assuming that a Nevada siteis the subject of the DOE license application. All other petitions to intervenewill be evaluated according to the factors in andSection; 2.1014(c)(1) through(3). Section 2.1015 Appeals Section 2.1015 sets forth the procedures for appealing decisions of thePre-License Application Licensing Board or of the Hearing Licensing Board.Unlike the existing appeals process, appeals from certain types of interlocutoryorders, such as rulings or the admissibility of contentions, must be filedwithin ten days, rather than at the conclusion of the proceeding. Section 2.1016 Motions Section 2.1016 establishes the procedures for motions practice in the HLWproceeding. The final rule does not contain a provision similar to 10 CFR2.730(d) in regard to oral arguments on motions. However, this omissionis not intended to change existing practice, i.e., requests for oral argumenton substantive motions are liberally granted. It is within the discretionof the Board to allow arguments on motions under 10 CFR 2.755. Section 2.1017 Computation of Time Section 2.1017 specifies the computation of time for an act or an eventfor the HLW licensing proceeding. Because of the availability of the electronictransmission of pleadings through the LSS, one day instead of five daysis allowed for the transmission of documents in response to the serviceof a notice or other document. This will save substantial time during thehearing. The use of electronic transmission is addressed in andSection; 2.1013.If the LSS is unavailable for more than four access hours of any day thatwould normally be counted in the computation of the time for filing, thatday will not be counted in the computation of time. However, this wouldnot include periods of LSS unavailability due to a malfunction of the LSSparticipant's equipment or to the operation of that equipment. Section 2.1018 Discovery Section 2.1018 specifies the scope and timing of discovery in the HLW Licensingproceeding. The LSS provides the document discovery in the HLW licensingproceeding, supplemented by the derivative discovery in andSection; 2.1019.Discovery is limited to access to the documentary material in the LSS;entry upon land for inspection and access to raw data; oral depositions;requests for admissions; and informal requests for information. These informalrequests would be for the type of information normally gathered throughthe use of written interrogatories, such as the names of all party's witnessesand the subjects they will address. Therefore, the final rule does notgenerally provide for the use of written interrogatories or depositionsupon written questions. However, if the informal discovery process doesnot satisfy a request for information, andSection; 2.1018(a)(2) providesa mechanism for the use of written interrogatories or depositions uponwritten questions, by order of a Discovery Master appointed under andSection;2.1018(g). If no Discovery Master has been appointed, the Hearing LicensingBoard itself may consider these petitions. Although informal discoverymay begin in the pre-license application phase, an order compelling discoverythrough written interrogatories or through depositions on written questionscan be issued by the Discovery Master or the Hearing Licensing Board onlyafter the license application has been docketed. The required showing of substantial need in regard to discovery for anLSS participant's ``representatives'' in andSection; 2.1018(b)(2) does notinclude ``consultants'' to a LSS participant, unless the consultant's responsibilitiesare to assist in preparation for litigation. Section 2.1018(c) empowers the Board to issue an order to protect a partyfrom abuse of the discovery process. As noted earlier, the objective ofthe negotiated rulemaking is to provide for the effective review of andhearing of the DOE license application within the three year time periodspecified in section 114(d) of the NWPA. Consistent with this objective,andSection; 2.1018(c) includes criteria to prevent abuse of the discoveryprocess from frustrating this objective. In ruling on motions to protecta party from a particular discovery request, the Board may consider any``undue delay'' that would result from the discovery request, as well asthe failure to respond to a discovery request. Under this criterion, theBoard will review any motion for a protective order from a particular discoveryrequest, including a request for a written deposition, to determine whetherthe request creates the potential for unreasonably interfering with meetingthe three year schedule. When a party or an interested governmental participantreasonably believes that the Board has not ruled in accordance with thisrule and its underlying policy, it may seek review pursuant to directedcertification under andSection; 2.718(i) of this part. The Commission itselfmay entertain such requests and will apply the criteria for granting directedcertification liberally. The Hearing Licensing Board or Discovery Mastermay also consider undue delay as a basis for granting a petition for theuse of written interrogatories or depositions on written questions underandSection; 2.1018(a)(2). In addition, andSection;andSection; 2.1021 and 2.1022, on the first and secondpre-hearing conferences respectively, provide for the establishment ofdiscovery schedules by the Board. In establishing these discovery schedules,the Board must consider the objective of meeting the three-year schedulespecified in the NWPA, as well as the early availability of informationmade possible by the Licensing Support System. Furthermore, the Board shouldexercise all due diligence to ensure that discovery is completed withintwo years of the notice of hearing. However, this could not prevent theBoard from establishing a schedule that provided for less than a continuoustwo-year period of discovery, or determining whether any discovery is necessaryafter the second pre-hearing conference. Section 2.1018(f) anticipates the application of the traditional sanctionsby the Licensing Board for failure to respond to a discovery request, includingthe issuance of an order for a response or answer to a discovery request.Section 2.1019 Depositions Section 2.1019 provides for discovery through the taking of depositions.Section 2.1019 basically follows the content of the general depositionrule in 10 CFR 2.740a. However, andSection; 2.1019(i) provides for the derivativediscovery of documents during the deposition. This provision establishesrequirements for the disclosure, and entry into the LSS, of material ina deponent's possession that would not be required to be initially enteredinto the LSS under andSection; 2.1003. This includes personal records, travelvouchers, speeches, preliminary drafts, and marginalia. ``Preliminary drafts''means any nonfinal document that is not a circulated draft, i.e., on whichno formal, unresolved objection or nonconcurrence has been made. ``Marginalia''means handwritten, printed, or other types of notations added to a document,excluding underlining and highlighting. Section 2.1020 Entry Upon Land for Inspection Section 2.1020 establishes the procedures for parties to gain access tothe land or property in the possession or control of another party or itscontractor for the purpose of inspection and access to raw data. However,this provision should not be construed as expanding any of the rights containedin section 116 or section 118 of the NWPA, or any other applicable statutoryor regulatory restrictions, related to site investigation. Section 2.1021 First Prehearing Conference Section 2.1021 establishes a first pre-hearing conference in the HLW proceeding.The first pre-hearing conference will identify the key issues in the proceeding,and consider petitions for intervention. Section 2.1022 Second Prehearing Conference Section 2.1022 establishes a second pre-hearing conference in the HLW licensingproceeding. The second pre-hearing conference is to be held not later thanseventy days after the NRC staff Safety Evaluation Report is issued. Thesecond pre-hearing conference will consider new or amended contentions,stipulations and admissions of fact, identification of witnesses, and thesetting of a hearing schedule. Section 2.1023 Immediate Effectiveness Section 2.1023 provides for an immediate effectiveness review of the LicensingBoard's initial decision on the issuance of a construction authorization.The Commission's existing regulations in 10 CFR 2.764 do not provide foran immediate effectiveness review. Rather 10 CFR 2.764 requires a Commissiondecision on the substantive merits of the Licensing Board decision beforea construction authorization decision can be final. Section 2.1023 wouldauthorize the Director of the NRC Office of Nuclear Material Safety andSafeguards to allow DOE to proceed with construction, assuming a favorableLicensing Board decision, if the Commission did not suspend the LicensingBoard decision after its supervisory immediate effectiveness review, orthe Appeal Board did not stay the effectiveness of the initial decisionunder 10 CFR 2.788. The Appeal Board and the Commission would then undertakea review of the substantive merits of the initial Licensing Board decision.Issuance of the construction authorization under these circumstances wouldbe the event that tolls the time period for determining whether the NWPAthree year time frame for the decision on the construction authorizationhad been satisfied. <ITAG tagnum="84">Schedule</ITAG>In order to assist the Hearing Licensing Board in establishing a schedulefor the HLW proceeding that will facilitate meeting the timeframe specifiedin the NWPA for a Commission decision on construction authorization, theCommission has prepared the following model timeline. This timeline isintended for general guidance only, and is not intended to suggest anypredisposition by the Commission on the merits of DOE's future licenseapplication.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,4,xls48,r25</C> <H1>Day </H1><H1>Regulation (10 CFR) </H1><H1>Action</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">0 <D>2.101(f)(8), 2.105(a)(5) </D><D>FR Notice of Hearing.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">30 <D>2.1014(a)(1) </D><D>Pet. to intervene/request for hearing. w, contentions.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>2.715(c) </D><D>Pet. for status as interested govt. participant (IGP).</D><ITAG tagnum="1">50 <D>2.1014(b) </D><D>Answers to intervention andamp; IGP petitions.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">70 <D>2.1021 </D><D>1st Prehearing Conference.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">100 <D> </D><D>1st Prehearing Conference Order: identifies participants in proceeding,admits contentions, and sets discovery and other schedules.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>2.1018(b)(1), 2.1019 </D><D>Deposition discovery begins.</D><ITAG tagnum="1">110 <D>2.1015(b) </D><D>Appeals from 1st Prehearing Conference Order, w/briefs.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">120 <D>2.1015(b) </D><D>Briefs in opposition to appeals.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">150 <D> </D><D>AB order ruling on appeals from 1st Prehearing Conference Order.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">548 <D> </D><D>NRC staff issues SER.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">588 <D>2.1014(a)(4) </D><D>Petitions to amend contentions based on SER.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">608 <D>2.1014(b) </D><D>Answers to petitions to amend SER-related contentions.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">618 <D>2.1022 </D><D>2nd Prehearing Conference.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">648 <D> </D><D>2nd Prehearing Conference Order: rules on amended contentions, setsany further discovery schedule, and sets schedule for prefiled testimonyand hearing.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">658 <D>2.1015(b) </D><D>Appeals from 2nd Prehearing Conference Order, w/briefs.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">668 <D>2.1015(b) </D><D>Briefs in opposition to appeals.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">698 <D> </D><D>AB order ruling on appeals from 2nd Prehearing Conference Order.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">700 <D>2.749 (set by LB) </D><D>Final motions for summary disposition.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">720 <D>2.749 </D><D>Replies to final motions for summary disposition.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">730 <D>Supp. Info. </D><D>Discovery complete.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">740 <D> </D><D>LB order on final motions for summary disposition.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">750 <D>2.1015(b) </D><D>Appeals from final summary disposition order, w/briefs.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">760 <D> </D><D>Evidentiary hearing begins.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>2.1015(b) </D><D>Briefs in opposition to appeals from final summary disposition orders.</D><ITAG tagnum="1">790 <D> </D><D>AB order on appeals from final summary disposition orders.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">850 <D> </D><D>Evidentiary hearing ends.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">880 <D>2.754(a)(1) </D><D>Applicant's proposed findings.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">890 <D>2.754(a)(2) </D><D>Other parties' (except NRC staff's) proposed findings.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">900 <D>2.754(a)(2) </D><D>NRC staff's proposed findings.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">905 <D>2.754(a)(3) </D><D>Applicant's reply to proposed findings.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">995 <D>2.760 </D><D>Initial decision.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1005 <D>2.788(a), 2.762(a), 2.1015(c) </D><D>Stay motions to AB Notices of Appeal.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1015 <D>2.788(d) </D><D>Replies to stay motions.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1035 <D> </D><D>AB ruling on stay motion.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>2.762(b) </D><D>Appellant's briefs.</D><ITAG tagnum="1">1045 <D>2.788(a) </D><D>Stay motions to Commission.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1055 <D>2.788(d) </D><D>Replies to stay motions.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1065 <D>2.762(c) </D><D>Appellee's brief.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1075 <D>2.762(c) </D><D>NRC staff brief.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1095 <D>2.1023, Supp. Info </D><D>Completion of NMSS and Commission supervisory review; Commission rulingon any stay motions; issuance of construction authorization; NWPA 3-yearperiod tolled.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1105 <D>2.763 </D><D>Oral argument on appeals.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1165 <D> </D><D>Appeal Board decision.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1180 <D>2.1015(e), 2.786(b)(1) </D><D>Petitions for Commission review.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1190 <D>2.786(b)(3) </D><D>Replies to petitions.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1250 <D> </D><D>Commission decision.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Topical Guidelines</ITAG>The following topical guidelines are to be used for identifying the documentarymaterial that should be submitted by LSS participants for entry into theLSS under section 2.1003. The topical guidelines will also be used by thePre-License Application Licensing Board for evaluating petitions for accessto the LSS during the pre-license application phase under andSection; 2.1008.I. Categories of Documents<ITAG tagnum="16">_Technical reports and analyses including those developed by contractors</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_QA/QC records including qualification and training records</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_External correspondence</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_Internal memoranda</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_Meeting minutes, including DOE/NRC meetings, Commission meetings</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_Drafts (i.e., those submitted for decision beyond the first levelof management or similar criterion)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_Congressional Q's andamp; A's</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_``Regulatory'' documents related to HLW site selection and licensing,such as:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Draft and final environmental assessments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Site characterization plans</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Site characterization study plans</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Site characterization progress reports</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Issue resolution reports</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Rulemakings</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Public and agency comments on documents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Response to public comments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Environmental Impact Statement, Comment Response Document, and relatedreferences</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_License Application (LA), LA data base, and related references</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Topical reports, data, and data analysis</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Recommendation Report to President</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Notice of Disapproval, if submitted</ITAG>II. General Topics1. Any document pertaining to the location and potential of valuable naturalresources, hydrology, geophysics, tectonics (including volcanism), geomorphology,seismic activity, atomic energy defense activities, proximity to watersupplies, proximity to populations, the effect upon the rights of usersof water, proximity to components of the National Park System, the NationalWildlife Refuge System, the National Wildlife and Scenic River System,the National Wilderness Preservation System, or National Forest Lands,proximity to sites where high-level radioactive waste and spent nuclearfuel is generated or temporarily stored, spent fuel and nuclear waste transportation,safety factors involved in moving spent fuel or nuclear waste to a repository,the cost and impact of transporting spent fuel and nuclear waste to a repositorysite, the advantages of regional distribution in siting of repositories,and various geologic media in which sites for repositories may be located.2. Any document related to repository design, siting, construction, oroperation, or the transportation of spent nuclear fuel and high-level nuclearwaste, not categorized as an ``excluded document'', generated by or inthe possession of any contractor of the Department of Energy, the NuclearRegulatory Commission, or any other party to the HLW licensing proceeding.3. All documents related to the physical attributes of the Basin and RangeProvince of the continental United States.4. Any document listing and/or considering any site or location other thanYucca Mountain as a possible location for a high level nuclear waste repository,or any alternative technology to deep geologic disposal.5. Any document analyzing the effect of the development of a repositoryat Yucca Mountain on the rights of users of water in the Armagosa ground-waterbasin in Nevada.6. Any document analyzing the health and safety implications to the peopleand environment of the transportation of spent fuel between locations wherespent fuel is generated or stored and Yucca Mountain, Nevada, or any othersite nominated for repository characterization on May 28, 1986, including,but not limited to:a. Any analysis of possible human error in the manufacture of spent fuelcasks;b. Any analysis of the actual population density along all of any specificprojected routes of travel;c. Any analysis of releases from any actual radioactive material transportationincidents;d. Any analysis of the emergency response time in any actual radioactivematerials transportation incident;e. Any actual accident data on any specific projected routes of travel;f. Any calculations or projections on the probabilities of accidents onany specific projected routes of travel;g. Any data on the physical properties or containment capabilities of spentfuel casks which have been used or which are projected to be used at anyhypothetical or actual projected repository;h. Any analysis of modeling of the containment capabilities of spent fuelcasks under a stress scenario;i. Any analysis or comparison of spent fuel casks projected to be usedagainst the spent fuel cask certification standards of the Nuclear RegulatoryCommission;j. Any analysis of the containment capabilities of spent fuel casks containingspent fuel which has been burned up over an extended period.7. Any document analyzing or comparing Yucca Mountain, Nevada, with anyother site in the same geohydrologic setting.8. Any document relating to potential interference or incompatibility betweena Yucca Mountain, Nevada, high-level nuclear waste repository and atomicenergy activities at the Nevada Test Site and Nellis Airforce base.9. Any document related to the land status, use or ownership of Yucca Mountain,Nevada.10. Any document considering or analyzing the attributes or detrimentsof any engineered barrier upon the radionuclide isolation capability ofYucca Mountain, Nevada, or any other site considered.11. Any document evaluating the effect of extended fuel burn-up on YuccaMountain, Nevada's adequacy as a repository site for disposal of spentfuel or upon the design of any such theoretical repository.12. Any document analyzing or investigating the potential for dischargeor radionuclides into the Death Valley National Monument.13. Any document analyzing the recharge of the underlying saturated zoneor the hydroconductivity of the unsaturated zone at Yucca Mountain.14. Any document containing any data or analysis of volcanism in the geologicsetting of which Yucca Mountain is a part.15. Any document containing any data or analysis of tectonic events atYucca Mountain, or pertaining to the tectonic framework of the Yucca Mountainarea or any document containing any data or analysis of faults with orwithout surface expression in the area of Yucca Mountain.16. Any document containing instructions or other limitations on the scopeof work to be performed by Department of Energy personnel or contractor'spersonnel.17. Any document pertaining to prevention or control of human intrusionat the Yucca Mountain site.III. Specific Topics<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>1,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s25</C> <H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1. The Site</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">A. Location, General Appearance and Terrain, and Present Use</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">B. Geologic Conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Stratigraphy and volcanic history of the Yucca Mountain area</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Caldera evolution and genesis of ash flows</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Timber Mountain Tuff</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Paintbrush Tuff</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Tuffaceous beds of Calico Hills</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Crater Flat Tuff</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Older tuffs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">g. Sedimentary units</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">h. Basalts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Structure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Seismicity</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Energy and mineral resources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Energy resources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Metals</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Nonmetals</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Paleontology</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. Mineralology</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7. Geomorphology</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8. Tectonics</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Faulting</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Stress</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Uplift/subsidence</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Volcanism</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C. Hydrologic Conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Surface water</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Ground water</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Ground water movement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Ground water quality</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Present and projected water use in the area</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Groundwater resources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Climatology</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. Metearology</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">D. Geochemistry</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Rock chemistry of the overlying and underlying host units</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Water chemistry of unsaturated or saturated zones</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Alteration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Retardation and transport</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">E. Environmental Setting</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Land use</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Federal use</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Agricultural</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Grazing land</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Cropland</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Mining</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Recreation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Private and commercial development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Terrestrial and aquatic ecosystems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Terrestrial vegetation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Larrea-Ambrosia</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Larrea-Ephedra or Larrea-Lycium</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Coleogyne</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Mixed transition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Grassland-burn site</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Terrestrial wildlife</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Mammals</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Birds</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Reptiles</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Special-interest species</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Aquatic ecosystems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Air quality and weather conditions: Air quality</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Noise</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Aesthetic resources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. Archaeological, cultural, and historical resources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7. Radiological background</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Monitoring program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Dose assessment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">F. Transportation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Highway infrastructure and current use</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Railroad infrastructure and current use</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">G. Socioeconomic Conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Economic conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Nye County</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Clark County</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Lincoln County</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Methodology</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Population density and distribution</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Populations of the State of Nevada</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Population of Nye County</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Population of Clark County</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Population of Lincoln County</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Community services</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Housing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Education</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Water supply</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Waste-water treatment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Solid waste</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Energy utilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">g. Public safety services</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">h. Medical and social services</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Library facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">j. Parks and recreation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Social conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Existing social organization and structure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Rural social organization and social structure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Social organization and structure in urban Clark County</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Culture and lifestyle</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Rural culture</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Urban culture</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Community attributes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Attitudes and perceptions toward the repository</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Fiscal and governmental structure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Expected Effects of the Site Characterization Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">A. Site Characterization Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Field studies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Exploratory drilling</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Geophysical surveys</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Geologic mapping</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Standard operating practices for reclamation of areas disturbedby field studies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. trenching</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Exploratory shaft facility</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Surface facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Exploratory shaft and underground workings</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Secondary egress shaft</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Exploratory shaft testing program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Final disposition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Standard operating practices that would minimize potential environmentaldamage</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Other studies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Geodetic surveys</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Horizontal core drilling</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Studies of past hydrologic conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Studies of tectonics, seismicity, and volcanism</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Studies of seismicity induced by weapons testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Field experiments in G-Tunnel facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">g. Laboratory studies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">h. Waste package design, testing, and analysis</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">B. Expected Effects of Site Characterization</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Expected effects on the environment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Geology, hydrology, land use and surface soils</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Geology</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Hydrology</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Land use</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Surface soils</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Ecosystems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Air quality</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Noise</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Aesthetics</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Archaeological, cultural, and historical resources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Socioeconomic and transportation conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Economic conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Employment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Materials</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Population density and distribution</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Community services</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Social conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Fiscal and governmental structure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Transportation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Worker safety</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Irreversible and irretrievable commitment of resources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C. Alternative Site Characterization Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Regional and Local Effects of Locating a Repository at the Site</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">A. The Repository</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Construction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. The surface facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Access to the subsurface</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. The subsurface facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Other construction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Access route</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Railroad</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Mined rock handling and storage facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Shafts and other facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Utilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Operations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Emplacement phase</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Waste receipt</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Waste emplacement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Caretaker phase</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Retrievability</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Decommissioning and closure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Schedule and labor force</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. Material and resource requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">B. Expected Effects on the Physical Environment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Geologic impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Hydrologic impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Land use</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Ecosystems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Air quality</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Ambient air-quality regulations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Construction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Operations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Decommissioning and closure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. Noise</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Construction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Operations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Decommissioning and closure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7. Aesthetic resources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8. Archaeological, cultural, and historical resources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9. Radiological effects</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Construction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Operation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Worker exposure during normal operation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Public exposure during normal operation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Accidental exposure during operation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C. Expected Effects of Transportation Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Transportation of people and materials</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Highway impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Construction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Operations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Decommissioning</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Railroad impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Transportation of nuclear wastes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Shipment and routing nuclear waste shipments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. National shipment and routing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Regional shipment and routing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Radiological impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. National impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Regional impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Maximally exposed individual impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Nonradiological impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. National impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Regional impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Risk summary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. National risk summary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Regional risk summary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Costs of nuclear waste transportation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Emergency response</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">D. Expected Effects on Socioeconomic Conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Economic conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Labor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Materials and resources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Cost</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Income</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Land use</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Tourism</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Population density and distribution</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Community services</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Housing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Education</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Water supply</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Waste-water treatment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Public safety services</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Medical services</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">g. Transportation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Social conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Social structure and social organization</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Standard effects on social structure and social organization</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Special effects on social structure and social organization</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Culture and lifestyle</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Attitudes and perceptions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Fiscal conditions and government structure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Suitability of the Yucca Mountain Site for Site Characterizationand for Development as a Repository</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">A. Suitability of the Yucca Mountain Site for Development as a Repository:Evaluation Against the Guidelines That Do Not Require Site Characterization</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Technical guidelines</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Postclosure site ownership and control</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable condition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse condition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the postclosuresite ownership and control guidelines</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Population density and distribution</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable condition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse condition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying condition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the populationdensity and distribution guideline</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Preclosure site ownership and control</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable condition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse condition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the preclosuresite ownership and control guideline</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Meteorology</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the meteorologyguideline</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Offsite installations and operations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the offsiteinstallations operations guideline</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Environmental quality</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying condition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the environmentalquality guidelines</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">g. Socioeconomic impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the socioeconomicguideline  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">h. Transportation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the transportationguideline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Preclosure System </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Preclosure system: radiological safety </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Evaluation of the Yucca Mountain site </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Conclusion for the qualifying condition on the preclosure systemquideline radiological safety </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Preclosure system: environment, socioeconomics, and transportation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Evaluation of the Yucca Mountain site </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Conclusion for the qualifying condition on the preclosure systemguideline: environment, socioeconomics, and transportation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Postclosure technical </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Geohydrology </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the postclosuregeohydrology guideline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Geochemistry </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the postclosuregeochemistry guideline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Plans for site characterization </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Rock characteristics </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying conditions on thepostclosure rock characteristics guideline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Climatic changes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Evaluation and conclusion for the climate changes qualifying condition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Erosion </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Dissolution </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Evaluation and Conclusion for the qualifying condition on the postclosureand dissolution guideline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">g. Tectonics </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the postclosuretectonics guideline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">h. Human interference: natural resources and site ownership and control</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the postclosurehuman interference and natural resources technical guideline</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Postclosure system </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Evaluation of the Yucca Mountain Site </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Quantitative analysis</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Qualitative analysis </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Summary and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the postclosuresystem guideline</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Preclosure technical </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Surface characteristics</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the postclosuresurface characteristics guideline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Rock characteristics </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the postclosurerock characteristics guideline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Hydrology </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable conditions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the postclosurehydrology guideline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">g. Tectonics </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Data relevant to the evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Favorable condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Potentially adverse conditions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iv. Disqualifying condition </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">v. Evaluation and conclusion for the qualifying condition on the postclosuretectonics guideline  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. Ease and cost of siting, construction, operation, and closure </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Data relevant to the evaluation  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Conclusions for the qualifying condition on the ease and cost ofsiting, construction, operation, and closure guideline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7. Conclusion regarding suitability of the Yucca Mountain Site forsite characterization</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">B. Performance Analyses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Preclosure radiological safety assessments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Preclosure radiation protection standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Methods for preclosure radiological assessment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Radiological assessment of construction activities </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Radiological assessement of normal operations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">iii. Radiological assessment of accidental releases</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Preliminary analysis of postclosure performance</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Subsystem description</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. Engineered barrier subsystem</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. The natural barrier subsystem</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Preliminary performance analyses of the major components of thesystem</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">i. The waste package lifetime</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">ii. Release rate from the engineered barrier subsystem</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Preliminary system performance description and analysis </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Comparisons with regulatory performance objectives</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Preliminary evaluation of disruptive events: disruptive naturalprocesses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Conclusions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Transportation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">A. Regulations Related to Safeguards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Safeguards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Conclusion</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">B. Packagings</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Packaging design, testing, and analysis</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Types of packaging</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Spent fuel</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Casks for defense high-level waste and West Valley high-level waste</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Casks for use from an MRS to the repository</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Possible future developments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Mode-specific regulations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Overweight truck casks</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Rod consolidation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Advanced handling concepts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Combination storage/shipping casks</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C. Potential Hazards of Transportation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Potential consequences to an individual exposed to a maximum extent</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Normal transport</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Accidents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Potential consequences to a large population from very severe transportationaccidents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Risk assessment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Outline of method for estimating population risks</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Computational models and methods for population risks</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">c. Changes to the analytical models and methods for population risks</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">d. Transportation scenarios evaluated for risk analysis</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">e. Assumption about wastes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Operational considerations for use in risk analysis</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">g. Values for factors needed to calculate population risks</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">h. Results of population risk analyses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">j. Uncertainties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Risks associated with defective cask construction, lack of qualityassurance, inadequate maintenance and human error</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">D. Cost Analysis</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Outline method</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Assumptions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Models</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Cost estimates</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Limitations of results</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">E. Barge Transport to Repositories</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">F. Effect of a Monitored Retrievable Storage Facility on TransportationEstimates</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">G. Effect of At-Reactor Rod Consolidation on Transportation Estimates</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">H. Criteria for Applying Transportation Guideline</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">I. DOE Responsibilities for Transportation Safety</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Prenotification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Emergency response</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Insurance coverage for transportation accidents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">J. Modal Mix</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Train shipments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Ordinary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Dedicated train</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Truck shipments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">a. Legal weight</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">b. Overweight</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Environmental Impact: Categorical Exclusion </ITAG>The NRC has determined that this final rule is the type of action describedin categorical exclusion 10 CFR 51.22(c)(1). Therefore, neither an environmentalimpact statement nor an environmental assessment has been prepared forthis final rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act Statement </ITAG>This rule does not contain information collection requirements that aresubject to the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3501 et seq.).<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Analysis </ITAG>The DOE analysis of the costs and benefits of the LSS (U.S. Departmentof Energy, ``Licensing Support System Benefit-Cost Analysis'' July, 1988)and companion DOE reports (``Preliminary Needs Analysis;'' ``PreliminaryData Scope Analysis;'' and ``Conceptual Design Analysis;'') are availablefor inspection in the NRC Public Document Room, 2120 L Street NW., Washington,DC. Single copies may be obtained from Francis X. Cameron, Office of GeneralCounsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington DC, 20555; Telephone:(301)-492-1623.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Analysis </ITAG>In accordance with the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (5 U.S.C. 605(b)),the Commission certifies that this rule will not, if promulgated, havea significant economic impact on a substantial number of small entities.The final rule affects participants in the Commission's HLW licensing proceeding.The substantial majority of these participants do not fall within the scopeof the definition of ``small entities'' set forth in the Regulatory FlexibilityAct or the Small Business Size Standards set out in regulations issuedby the Small Business Administration at 13 CFR Part 121.<ITAG tagnum="84">Backfit Analysis </ITAG>The NRC has determined that the backfit rule, 10 CFR 50.109, does not applyto this rule and, therefore, that a backfit analysis is not required forthis rule because these amendments do not involve any provisions whichwould impose backfits as defined in 10 CFR 50.109(a)(1).<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 10 CFR Part 2 </ITAG>Administrative practice and procedure. Antitrust, Byproduct material, Classifiedinformation, Environmental protection, Nuclear materials, Nuclear powerplants and reactors, Penalty, Sex discrimination, Source material, Specialnuclear material, Waste treatment and disposal. For the reasons set out in the preamble and under the authority of theAtomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, the Energy Reorganization Act of1974, as amended, and 5 U.S.C. 552 and 553, the NRC is adopting the followingamendments to 10 CFR Part 2.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 2_RULES OF PRACTICE FOR DOMESTIC LICENSING PROCEEDINGS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 2 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 161, 181, 68 Stat. 948, 953, as amended (42 U.S.C.2201, 2231); sec. 191, as amended, Pub. L. 87-615, 76 Stat. 409 (42 U.S.C.2241); sec. 201, 88 Stat. 1242, as amended (42 U.S.C. 5841); 5 U.S.C. 552.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 2.101 also issued under secs. 53, 62, 63, 81, 103, 104, 105,68 Stat. 930, 932, 933, 935, 936, 937, 938, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2073,2092, 2093, 2111, 2133, 2134, 2135); sec. 102, Pub. L. 91-190, 83 Satat.853, as amended (42 U.S.C. 4332); sec. 301, 88 Stat. 1248 (42 U.S.C. 5871).Sections 2.102, 2.103, 2.104, 2.105, 2.721 also issued under secs. 102,103, 104, 105, 183, 189, 68 Stat. 936, 937, 938, 954, 955, as amended (42U.S.C. 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2233, 2239). Section 2.105 also issued underPub. L. 97-415, 96 Stat. 2073 (42 U.S.C. 2239). Sections 2.200-2.206 alsoissued under secs. 186, 234, 68 Stat. 955, 83 Stat. 444, as amended (42U.S.C. 2236, 2282); sec. 206, 88 Stat. 1246 (42 U.S.C. 5846). Sections2.600-2.606 also issued under sec. 102, Pub. L. 91-190, 83 Stat. 853, asamended (42 U.S.C. 4332). Sections 2.700a, 2.719 also issued under 5 U.S.C.554. Sections 2.754, 2.760, 2.770, 2.780 also issued under 5 U.S.C. 557.Section 2.764 and Table 1A of Appendix C also issued under secs. 135, 141,Pub. L. 97-425, 96 Stat. 2232, 2241 (42 U.S.C. 10155, 10161). Section 2.790also issued under sec. 103, 68 Stat. 936, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2133) and5 U.S.C. 552. Sections 2.800 and 2.808 also issued under 5 U.S.C. 553.Section 2.809 also issued under 5 U.S.C. 553 and sec. 29, Pub. L. 85-256,71 Stat. 579, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2039). Subpart K also issued undersec. 189, 68 Stat. 955 (42 U.S.C. 2239); sec. 134, Pub. L. 97-425, 96 Stat.2230 (42 U.S.C. 10154). Appendix A also issued under sec. 6, Pub. L. 91-560,84 Stat. 1473 (42 U.S.C. 2135). Appendix B also issued under sec. 10, Pub.L. 99-240, 99 Stat. 1842 (42 U.S.C. 2021b et seq.).</ITAG>2. Section 2.700 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.700</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of subpart. </ITAG>The general rules of this subpart govern procedure in all adjudicationsinitiated by the issuance of an order to show cause, an order pursuantto andSection; 2.205(e), a notice of hearing, a notice of proposed actionpursuant to section 2.105, or a notice issued pursuant to andSection; 2.102(d)(3).The procedure applicable to the proceeding on an application for a licenseto receive and possess high-level radioactive waste at a geologic repositoryoperations area are set forth in Subpart J.    3. A new paragraph (i) is added to andSection; 2.714 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.714</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Intervention </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(1) The provisions of this section do not apply to license applicationsdocketed under subpart J of this part. 4. In andSection; 2.722, paragraph (a)(4) is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.722</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special assistants to the presiding officer. </ITAG>(a) * * * (4) Discovery Master to rule on the matters specified in andSection; 2.1018(a)(2)of this part. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>5. In andSection; 2.743, paragraph (f) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.743</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Evidence. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(f) <T3>Exhibits. </T3>A written exhibit will not be received in evidence unlessthe original and two copies are offered and a copy is furnished to eachparty, or the parties have been previously furnished with copies or thepresiding officer directs otherwise. The presiding officer may permit aparty to replace with a true copy an original document admitted in evidence.Exhibits in the proceeding on an application for a license to receive andpossess high-level radioactive waste at a geologic repository operationsarea are governed by andSection; 2.1013 of this part. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.764</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>6. In andSection; 2.764, paragraph (d) is removed. 7. In Part 2, a new Subpart J is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart J_Procedures Applicable to Proceedings for the Issuance ofLicenses for the Receipt of High-Level Radioactive Waste at a GeologicRepository </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1000 Scope of subpart. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1001 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1002 High-level Waste Licensing Support System. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1003 Submission of material to the LSS. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1004 Amendments and additions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1005 Exclusions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1006 Privilege. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1007 Access. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1008 Potential parties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1009 Procedures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1010 Pre-License Application Licensing Board. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1011 LSS management and administration. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1012 Compliance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1013 Use of LSS during adjudicatory proceeding. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1014 Intervention. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1015 Appeals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1016 Motions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1017 Computation of time. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1018 Discovery. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1019 Depositions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1020 Entry upon land for inspection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1021 First prehearing conference. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1022  Second prehearing conference. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1023 Immediate effectiveness. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart J_Procedures Applicable to Proceedings for the Issuance ofLicenses for the Receipt of High-Level Radioactive Waste at a GeologicRepository </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1000</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of subpart. </ITAG>The rules in this subpart govern the procedure for applications for a licenseto receive and possess high-level radioactive waste at a geologic repositoryoperations area noticed pursuant to andSection; 2.101(f)(8) or andSection;2.105(a)(5) of this part. The procedures in this subpart take precedenceover the 10 CFR Subpart G, rules of general applicability, except for thefollowing provisions: andSection;andSection; 2.702, 2.703, 2.704, 2.707, 2,709,2.711, 2.713, 2.715, 2.715a, 2.717, 2.718, 2.720, 2.721, 2.722, 2.732,2.733, 2.734, 2.742, 2.743, 2.749, 2.750, 2.751, 2.753, 2.754, 2.755, 2.756,2.757, 2.758, 2.759, 2.760, 2.761, 2.762, 2.763, 2.770, 2.771, 2.772, 2.780,2.781, 2.785, 2.786, 2.787, 2.788, and 2.790. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>``ASCII File'' means a computerized text file conforming to the AmericanStandard Code for Information Interchange which represent characters andsymbols. ``Bibliographic header'' means the minimum series of descriptive fieldsthat a potential party, interested governmental participant, or party mustsubmit with a document or other material. The bibliographic header fieldsare a subset of the fields in the full header. ``Circulated draft'' means a nonfinal document circulated for supervisoryconcurrence or signature in which the original author or others in theconcurrence process have non-concurred. A ``circulated draft'' meetingthe above criterion includes a draft of a document that eventually becomesa final document, and a draft of a document that does not become a finaldocument due to either a decision not to finalize the document or the passageof a substantial period of time in which no action has been taken on thedocument. ``Document'' means any written, printed, recorded, magnetic, graphic matter,or other documentary material, regardless of form or characteristic. ``Documentary material'' means any material or other information that isrelevant to, or likely to lead to the discovery of information that isrelevant to, the licensing of the likely candidate site for a geologicrepository. The scope of documentary material shall be guided by the topicalguidelines in the applicable NRC Regulatory Guide. ``DOE'' means the U.S. Department of Energy or its duly authorized representatives.``Full header'' means the series of descriptive fields and subject termsgiven to a document or other material. ``Image'' means a visual likeness of a document, presented on a paper copy,microform, or a bit-map on optical or magnetic media. ``Interested governmental participant'' means any person admitted underandSection; 2.715(c) of this part to the proceeding on an application fora license to receive and possess high-level radioactive waste at a geologicrepository operations area pursuant to Part 60 of this chapter. ``LSS Administrator'' means the person within the U.S. Nuclear RegulatoryCommission responsible for administration, management, and operation ofthe Licensing Support System. The LSS Administrator shall not be in anyorganizational unit that either represents the U.S. Nuclear RegulatoryCommission staff as a party to the high-level waste licensing proceedingor is a part of the management chain reporting to the Director of the Officeof Nuclear Material Safety and Safeguards. For purposes of this subpartthe organizational unit within the NRC selected to be the LSS Administratorshall not be considered to be a party to the proceeding. ``Marginalia'' means handwritten, printed, or other types of notationsadded to a document excluding underlining and highlighting. ``NRC'' means the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission or its duly authorizedrepresentatives. ``Party'' for purposes of this subpart means the DOE, the NRC staff, thehost State and any affected Indian Tribe in accordance with andSection; 60.63(a)of this chapter, and a person admitted under andSection; 2.1014 of this subpartto the proceeding on an application for a license to receive and possesshigh-level radioactive waste at a geologic repository operations area pursuantto Part 60 of this chapter; provided that a host State or affected IndianTribe shall file a list of contentions in accordance with the provisionsof andSection; 2.1014(a)(2) (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this subpart. ``Personal record'' means a document in the possession of an individualassociated with a party, interested governmental participant, or potentialparty that was not required to be created or retained by the party, interestedgovernmental participant, or potential party, and can be retained or discardedat the possessor's sole discretion, or documents of a personal nature thatare not associated with any business of the party, interested governmentalparticipant, or potential party. ``Potential party'' means any person who, during the period before theissuance of the first pre-hearing conference order under andSection; 2.1021(d)of this subpart, is granted access to the Licensing Support System andwho consents to comply with the regulations set forth in Subpart J of thispart, including the authority of the Pre-License Application LicensingBoard established pursuant to andSection; 2.1010 of this subpart. ``Pre-license application phase'' means the time period before the licenseapplication to receive and possess high-level radioactive waste at a geologicrepository operations area is docketed under section 2.101(f)(3) of thispart. ``Preliminary draft'' means any nonfinal document that is not a circulateddraft. ``Searchable full text'' means the electronic indexed entry of a documentin ASCII into the Licensing Support System that allows the identificationof specific words or groups of words within a text file. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1002 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">High-level waste Licensing Support System. </ITAG>(a) The Licensing Support System is an electronic information managementsystem containing the documentary material of the DOE and its contractors,and the documentary material of all other parties, interested governmentalparticipants and potential parties and their contractors. Access to theLicensing Support System by the parties, interested governmental participants,and potential parties provides the document discovery in the proceeding.The Licensing Support System provides for the electronic transmission offilings by the parties during the high-level waste proceeding, and ordersand decisions of the Commission and Commission adjudicatory boards relatedto the proceeding. (b) The Licensing Support System shall include documentary material notprivileged under andSection;2.1006 or excluded under andSection;2.1005 of thissubpart.   (c) The participation of the host State in the Licensing Support Systemduring the pre-license application phase shall not have any affect on theState's exercise of its disapproval rights under section 116(b)(2) of theNuclear Waste Policy Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 10136(b)(2).  (d) This subpart shall not affect any independent right of a potentialparty, interested governmental participant or party to receive information. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;2.1003  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Submission of material to the LSS.  </ITAG>(a) Subject to the exclusions in andSection;2.1005 of this subpart and paragraphs(c) and (d) of this section, each potential party, interested governmentalparticipant or party, with the exception of the DOE and the NRC, shallsubmit to the LSS Administrator_  (1) Subject to paragraph (a)(3) of this section, an ASCII file, an image,and a bibliographic header, reasonably contemporaneous with its creationor acquisition, for all documentary material (including circulated draftsbut excluding preliminary drafts) generated by, or at the direction of,or acquired by, a potential party, interested governmental participant,or party after the date on which such potential party, interested governmentalparticipant or party is given access to the Licensing Support System. (2) An image, a bibliographic header, and, if available, an ASCII file,no later than six months before the license application is submitted underandSection;60.22 of this chapter, for all documentary material (includingcirculated drafts but excluding preliminary drafts), generated by, or atthe direction of, or acquired by, a potential party, interested governmentalparticipant, or party, on or before the date on which such potential party,interested governmental participant, or party was given access to the LicensingSupport System. (3) An image and bibliographic header for documentary material includedunder paragraphs (a)(1) of this section that were acquired from a personthat is not a potential party, party, or interested governmental participant. (b) Subject to the exclusions in andSection;2.1005 of this subpart, and subjectto paragraphs (c) and (d) of this section, the DOE and the NRC shall submitto the LSS Administrator_  (1) An ASCII file, an image, and a bibliographic header, reasonably contemporaneouswith its creation or acquisition, for all documentary material (includingcirculated drafts but excluding preliminary drafts) generated by, or atthe direction of, or acquired by, the DOE or the NRC after the date onwhich the Licensing Support System is available for access.  (2) An ASCII file, an image, and a bibliographic header no later than sixmonths before the license application is submitted under andSection;60.22of this chapter for all documentary material (including circulated draftsbut excluding preliminary drafts) generated by, or at the direction of,or acquired by, the DOE or the NRC on or before the date on which the LicensingSupport System is available for access.  (c)(1) Each potential party, interested governmental participant, or partyshall submit, subject to the claims of privilege in andSection;2.1006, animage and a bibliographic header, in a time frame to be established bythe access protocols under andSection;2.1011(d)(10) of this subpart, forall graphic oriented documentary material. Graphic-oriented documentarymaterial includes, raw data, computer runs, computer programs and codes,field notes, laboratory notes, maps, diagrams and photographs which havebeen printed, scripted, hand written or otherwise displayed in any hardcopy form and which, while capable of being captured in electronic imageby a digital scanning device, may be captured and submitted to the LSSAdministrator in any form of image. Text embedded within these documentsneed not be separately entered in searchable full text. Such graphic-orienteddocuments may include: Calibration procedures, logs, guidelines, data anddiscrepancies; Gauge, meter and computer settings; Probe locations; Loggingintervals and rates; Data logs in whatever form captured; Text data sheets;Equations ands sampling rates; Sensor data and procedures; Data Descriptions;Field and laboratory notebooks; Analog computer, meter or other deviceprint-outs; Digital computer print-outs; Photographs; Graphs, plots, stripcharts, sketches; Descriptive material related to the information above. (2) Each potential party, interested governmental participant, or party,in a time frame to be established by the access protocols under andSection;2.1011(d)(10)of this subpart, shall submit, subject to the claims of privilege in andSection;2.1006,only a bibliographic header for each item of documentary material thatis not suitable for entry into the Licensing Support System in image orsearchable full text. The header shall include all required fields andshall sufficiently describe the information and references to related informationand access protocols. Whenever any documentary material is transferredto some other media, a new header shall be supplied. Any documentary materialfor which a header only has been supplied to the system shall be made availableto any other party, potential party or interested governmental participantthrough the access protocols determined by the LSS Administrator underandSection;2.1011(d)(10) or through entry upon land for inspection and otherpurposes pursuant to andSection;2.1020.  (3) Whenever documentary material described in paragraphs (c)(1) or (c)(2)of this section has been collected or used in conjunction with other suchinformation to analyze, critique, support or justify any particular technicalor scientific conclusion, or relates to other documentary material as partof the same scope of technical work or investigation, then an appropriatebibliographic header shall be submitted for a table of contents describingthat package of information, and documentary material contained withinthat package shall be named and identified.  (d) Each potential party, interested governmental participant, or partyshall submit a bibliographic header for each documentary material_  (1) For which a claim of privilege is asserted; or   (2) Which constitutes confidential financial or commercial information;or  (3) Which constitutes safeguards information under andSection;73.21 of thisChapter.  (e) In addition to the submission of documentary material under paragraphs(a) and (b) of this section, potential parties, interested governmentalparticipants, or parties may request that another potential party's, interestedgovernmental participant's, party's, or third party's documentary materialbe entered into the Licensing Support System in searchable full text ifthey or the other potential party, interested governmental participant,or party intend to rely on such documentary material during the licensingproceeding.(f) Submission of ASCII files, images, and bibliographic headers shallbe in accordance with established criteria.(g) Basic licensing documents generated by DOE, such as the Site CharacterizationPlan, the Environmental Impact Statement, and the license application,or by NRC such as the Site Characterization Analysis, and the Safety EvaluationReport, shall be submitted to the LSS Administrator by the respective agencythat generated the document.(h)(1) Docketing of the application for a license to receive and possesshigh-level radioactive waste at a geologic repository operations area shallnot be permitted under Subpart J of this part unless the LSS Administratorhas certified, at least six months in advance of the submission of thelicense application, that the DOE has substantially complied with its obligationsunder this section.(2)(i) The LSS Administrator shall evaluate the extent of the DOE's compliancewith the provisions of this section at six month intervals beginning sixmonths after his or her appointment under andSection; 2.1011 of this subpart.(ii) The LSS Administrator shall issue a written report of his or her evaluationof DOE compliance under paragraph (h)(1) of this section. The report shallinclude recommendations to the DOE on any actions necessary to achievesubstantial compliance pursuant to paragraph (h)(1) of this section.(iii) Potential parties may submit comments on the report prepared pursuantto paragraph (h)(2)(ii) of this section to the LSS Administrator.(3)(i) In the event that the LSS Administrator does not certify substantialcompliance under paragraph (h)(1) of this section, the proceeding on theapplication for a license to receive and possess high-level radioactivewaste at a geologic repository operations area shall be governed by SubpartG of this part.(ii) If, subsequent to the submission of such application under SubpartG of this part, the LSS Administrator issues the certification describedin paragraph (h)(1) of this section, the Commission may, upon request byany party or interested governmental participant to the proceeding, specifythe extent to which the provisions of Subpart J of this part may be usedin the proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1004</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendments and additions.</ITAG>(a) Within sixty days after a document has been entered into the LicensingSupport System by the LSS Administrator during the pre-license applicationphase, and within five days after a document has been entered into theLicensing Support System by the LSS Administrator after the license applicationhas been docketed, the submitter shall make reasonable efforts to verifythat the document has been entered correctly, and shall notify the LSSAdministrator of any errors in entry.(b) After the time period specified for verification in paragraph (a) ofthis section has expired, a submitter who desires to amend an incorrectdocument shall_(1) Submit the corrected version to the LSS Administrator for entry asa separate document; and(2) Submit a bibliographic header for the corrected version that identifiesall revisions to the corrected version.(3) The LSS Administrator shall ensure that the bibliographic header forthe original document specifies that a corrected version is also in theLicensing Support System.(c)(1) A submitter shall submit any revised pages of a document in theLicensing Support System to the LSS Administrator for entry into the LicensingSupport System as a separate document.(2) The LSS Administrator shall ensure that the bibliographic header forthe original document specifies that revisions have been entered into theLicensing Support System.(d) Any document that has been incorrectly excluded from the LicensingSupport System must be submitted to the LSS Administrator by the potentialparty, interested governmental participant, or party responsible for thesubmission of the document within two days after its exclusion has beenidentified unless some other time is approved by the Pre-License ApplicationLicensing Board or the Licensing Board established for the high-level wasteproceeding, hereinafter the ``Hearing Licensing Board''; provided, however,that the time for submittal under this paragraph will be stayed pendingBoard action on a motion to extend the time of submittal.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1005</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exclusions.</ITAG>The following material is excluded from entry into the Licensing SupportSystem, either through initial entry pursuant to andSection; 2.1003 of thissubpart, or through derivative discovery pursuant to andSection; 2.1019(i)of this subpart_(a) Official notice materials;(b) Reference books and text books;(c) Material pertaining exclusively to administration, such as materialrelated to budgets, financial management, personnel, office space, generaldistribution memoranda, or procurement, except for the scope of work ona procurement related to repository siting, construction, or operation,or to the transportation of spent nuclear fuel or high-level waste;(d) Press clippings and press releases;(e) Junk mail;(f) Preferences cited in contractor reports that are readily available;(g) Classified material subject to Subpart I of this Part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1006</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Privilege.</ITAG>(a) Subject to the requirements in andSection; 2.1003(d) of this subpart,the traditional discovery privileges recognized in NRC adjudicatory proceedingsand the exceptions from disclosure in andSection; 2.790 of this part maybe asserted by potential parties, interested governmental participants,and parties. In addition to Federal agencies, the deliberative processprivilege may also be asserted by State and local government entities andIndian Tribes.(b) Any document for which a claim of privilege is asserted but is deniedin whole or in part by the Pre-license Application Licensing Board or theHearing Licensing Board shall be submitted by the party, interested governmentalparticipant, or potential party that asserted the claim to_(1) The LSS Administrator for entry into the Licensing Support System intoan open access file; or(2) To the LSS Administrator or to the Board, for entry into a ProtectiveOrder file, if the Board so directs under andSection; 2.1010(b) or andSection;2.1018(c) of this subpart.(c) Notwithstanding any availability of the deliberative process privilegeunder paragraph (a) of this section, circulated drafts not otherwise privilegedshall be submitted for entry into the Licensing Support System pursuantto andSection;andSection; 2.1003(a) and 2.1003(b) of this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1007</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Access.</ITAG>(a)(1) Terminals for access to full headers for all documents in the LicensingSupport System during the pre-license application phase, and images ofthe non-privileged documents of DOE, shall be provided at the headquartersof DOE, and at all DOE Local Public Document Rooms established in the vicinityof the likely candidate site for a geologic repository.(2) Terminals for access to full headers for all documents in the LicensingSupport System during the pre-license application phase, and images ofthe non-privielged documents of NRC, shall be provided at the headquartersPublic Document Room of NRC, and at all NRC Local Public Document Roomsestablished in the vicinity of the likely candidate site for a geologicrepository, and at the NRC Regional Offices, including the Uranium RecoveryField Office in Denver, Colorado.(3) The access terminals specified in paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) of thissection shall include terminals at Las Vegas, Nevada; Reno, Nevada; CarsonCity, Nevada; Nye County, Nevada; and Lincoln County, Nevada.(4) The headers specified in paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this sectionshall be available at the same time that those headers are made availableto the potential parties, parties, and interested governmental participants.(5) Public access to the searchable full text and images of all the documentsin the Licensing Support System, not privileged under section 2.1006, shallbe provided by the LSS Administrator at all the locations specified inparagraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section after a notice of hearinghas been issued pursuant to andSection; 2.101(f)(8) or andSection; 2.105(a)(5)on an application for a license to receive and possess high-level radioactivewaste at a geologic repository operations area.(b) Public availability of paper copies of the records specified in paragraph(a) of this section, as well as duplication fees, and fee waiver for thoserecords, will be governed by the Freedom of Information Act regulationsof the respective agencies.(c) Access to the Licensing Support System for potential parties, interestedgovernmental participants, and parties will be provided in the followingmanner_(1) Full text search capability through dial-up access from remote locationsat the requestor's expense;(2) Image access at remote locations at the requestor's expense;(3) The capability to electronically request a paper copy of a documentat the time of search;(4) Generic fee waiver for the paper copy requested under paragraph (c)(3)of this section for requestors who meet the criteria in andSection; 9.41of this chapter.(d) Documents submitted to the LSS Administrator for entry into the LicensingSupport System shall not be considered as agency records of the LSS Administratorfor purposes of the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA), 5 U.S.C. 552, andshall remain under the custody and control of the agency or organizationthat submitted the documents to the LSS Administrator. Requests for accesspursuant to the FOIA to documents submitted by a Federal agency shall betransmitted to that Federal agency.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1008</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Potential parties.</ITAG>(a) A person may petition the Pre-License Application Licensing Board establishedpursuant to andSection; 2.1010 of this subpart for access to the LicensingSupport System.(b) A petition must set forth with particularity the interest of the petitionerin gaining access to the Licensing Support System with particular referenceto_(1) The factors set out in andSection; 2.1014(c) (1), (2), and (3) of thissubpart as determined in reference to the topical guidelines in the applicableNRC Regulatory Guide; or(2) The criteria in andSection; 2.715(c) of this part as determined in referenceto the topical guidelines in the applicable NRC Regulatory Guide.(c) The Pre-License Application Licensing Board shall, in ruling on a petitionfor access, consider the factors set forth in paragraph (b) of this section.(d) Any person whose petition for access is approved pursuant to paragraph(c) of this section shall comply with the regulations set forth in thissubpart, including andSection; 2.1003, and agree to comply with the ordersof the Pre-License Application Licensing Board established pursuant toandSection; 2.1010 of this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1009</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures.</ITAG>(a) Each potential party, interested governmental participant, or partyshall_(1) Designate an official who will be responsible for administration ofits Licensing Support System responsibilities; (2) Establish procedures to implement the requirements in andSection; 2.1003of this subpart; (3) Provide training to its staff on the procedures for implementationof Licensing Support System responsibilities; (4) Ensure that all documents carry the submitter's unique identificationnumber; (5) Cooperate with the advisory review process established by the LSS Administratorpursuant to andSection; 2.1011(e) of this subpart. (b) The responsible official designated pursuant to paragraph (a)(1) ofthis section shall certify to the LSS Administrator, at six month intervalsdesignated by the LSS Administrator, that the procedures specified in paragraph(a)(2) of this section have been implemented, and that to the best of hisor her knowledge, the documentary material specified in andSection; 2.1003of this subpart has been identified and submitted to the Licensing SupportSystem. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1010 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pre-License Application Licensing Board. </ITAG>(a)(1) A Pre-License Application Licensing Board designated by the Commissionshall rule on all petitions for access to the Licensing Support Systemsubmitted under andSection; 2.1008 of this subpart; disputes over the entryof documents during the pre-license application phase, including disputesrelating to relevance and privilege; disputes relating to the LSS Administrator'sdecision on substantial compliance pursuant to andSection; 2.1003(h) of thissubpart; discovery disputes; disputes relating to access to the LicensingSupport System; disputes relating to the design and development of theLicensing Support System by DOE or the operation of the Licensing SupportSystem by the LSS Administrator under andSection; 2.1011 of this subpart,including disputes relating to the implementation of the recommendationsof the LSS Advisory Review Panel established under andSection; 2.1011(e)of this subpart. (2) The Pre-License Application Licensing Board shall be designated sixmonths before access to the Licensing Support System is scheduled to beavailable. (b) The Board shall rule on any claim of document withholding to determine_(1) Whether it is documentary material within the scope of this subpart;(2) Whether the material is excluded from entry into the Licensing SupportSystem under andSection; 2.1005 of this subpart; (3) Whether the material is privileged or otherwise excepted from disclosureunder section 2.1006 of this subpart; (4) If privileged, whether it is an absolute or qualified privilege; (5) If qualified, whether the document should be disclosed because it isnecessary to a proper decision in the proceeding; (6) Whether the material should be disclosed under a protective order containingsuch protective terms and conditions (including affidavits of non-disclosure)as may be necessary and appropriate to limit the disclosure to potentialparticipants, interested governmental participants and parties in the proceeding,or to their qualified witnesses and counsel. When Safeguards Informationprotected from disclosure under section 147 of the Atomic Energy Act, asamended, is received and possessed by a potential party, interested governmentalparticipant, or party, other than the Commission staff, it shall also beprotected according to the requirements of andSection; 73.21 of this chapter.The Board may also prescribe such additional procedures as will effectivelysafeguard and prevent disclosure of Safeguards Information to unauthorizedpersons with minimum impairment of the procedural rights which would beavailable if Safeguards Information were not involved. In addition to anyother sanction that may be imposed by the Board for violation of an orderissued pursuant to this paragraph, violation of an order pertaining tothe disclosure of Safeguards Information protected from disclosure undersection 147 of the Atomic Energy Act, as amended, may be subject to a civilpenalty imposed pursuant to andSection; 2.205 of this part. For the purposeof imposing the criminal penalties contained in section 223 of the AtomicEnergy Act, as amended, any order issued pursuant to this paragraph withrespect to Safeguards Information shall be deemed an order issued undersection 161b of the Atomic Energy Act. (c) Upon a final determination that the material is relevant, and not privileged,exempt from disclosure, or otherwise exempt from entry into the LicensingSupport System under andSection; 2.1005 of this subpart, the potential party,interested governmental participant, or party who asserted the claim ofwithholding must submit the document to the LSS Administrator within twodays for entry into the Licensing Support System. (d) The service of all pleadings, discovery requests and answers, orders,and decisions during the pre-license application phase shall be made accordingto the procedures specified in andSection; 2.1013(c) of this subpart. (e) the Pre-License Application Licensing Board shall possess all the generalpowers specified in andSection;andSection; 2.721(d) and 2.718 of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1011 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">LSS Management and administration. </ITAG>(a) The Licensing Support System shall be administered by the LSS Administratorwho will be designated within sixty days after the effective date of therule. (b)(1) Consistent with the requirements in this subpart, and in consultationwith the LSS Administrator, DOE shall be responsible for the design anddevelopment of the computer system necessary to implement the LicensingSupport System, including the procurement of computer hardware and software,and, with the concurrence of the LSS Administrator, the follow-on redesignand procurement of equipment necessary to maintain the Licensing SupportSystem. (2) With respect to the procurement undertaken pursuant to paragraph (b)(1)of this section, a representative of the LSS Administrator shall participateas a member of the Source Evaluation Panel for such procurement. (3) DOE shall implement consensus advice from the LSS Advisory Review Panelunder paragraph (f)(1) of this section that is consistent with the requirementsof this subpart. (c)(1) The Licensing Support System, described in andSection; 2.1002, shallnot be part of any computer system that is controlled by any party, interestedgovernmental participant, or potential party, including DOE and its contractors,or that is physically located on the premises of any party, interestedgovernmental participant, or potential party, including DOE and that ofits contractors. (2) Nothing in this subpart shall preclude DOE, NRC, or any other party,potential party, or interested governmental participant, from using theLicensing Support System computer facility for a records management systemfor documentary material independent of the Licensing Support System. (d) The LSS Administrator shall be responsible for the management and administrationof the Licensing Support System, including the responsibility to_ (1) Implement the consensus advice of the LSS Advisory Review Panel underparagraph (f) of this section that is consistent with the requirementsof this subpart; (2) Provide the necessary personnel, materials, and services for operationand maintenance of the Licensing Support System; (3) Identify and recommend to DOE any redesign or procurement actions necessaryto ensure that the design and operation of the Licensing Support Systemmeets the objectives of this subpart; (4) Make a concurrence decision, within thirty days of a request from DOE,on any redesign and related procurement performed by DOE under paragraph(b) of this section; (5) Consult with DOE on the design and development of the Licensing SupportSystem under paragraph (b) of this section; (6) Evaluate and certify compliance with the requirements of this subpartunder andSection; 2.1003(h); (7) Ensure LSS availability and the integrity of the LSS data base; (8) Receive and enter the documentary material specified in andSection; 2.1003of this subpart into the Licensing Support System in the appropriate format;(9) Maintain security for the Licensing Support System data base, includingassigning user password security codes; (10) Establish access protocols for raw data, field notes, and other itemscovered by andSection; 2.1003(c) of this subpart; (11) Maintain the thesaurus and authority tables for the Licensing SupportSystem; (12) Establish and implement a training program for Licensing Support Systemusers; (13) Provide support staff to assist users of the Licensing Support System;(14) Other duties as specified in this subpart or necessary for LicensingSupport System operation and maintenance. (e)(1) The LSS Administrator shall establish an LSS Advisory Review Panelcomposed of the LSS Advisory Committee members identified in paragraph(e)(2) of this section who wish to serve within sixty days after designationof the LSS Administrator pursuant to paragraph (a) of this section. TheLSS Administrator shall have the authority to appoint additional representativesto the Advisory Review Panel consistent with the requirements of the FederalAdvisory Committee Act, 5 U.S.C. App. I, giving particular considerationto potential parties, parties, and interested governmental participantswho were not members of the NRC HLW Licensing Support System Advisory Committee.(2) Pending the establishment of the LSS Advisory Review Panel under paragraph(e)(1) of this section, the NRC will establish a Licensing Support SystemAdvisory Committee whose membership will initially include the State ofNevada, a coalition of affected units of local government in Nevada whowere on the NRC High-Level Waste Licensing Support System Advisory Committee,DOE, NRC, the National Congress of American Indians, the coalition of nationalenvironmenal groups who were on the NRC High-Level Waste Licensing SupportSystem Advisory Committee and such other members as the Commission mayfrom time to time designate to perform the responsibilities in paragraph(f) of this section. (f)(1) The LSS Advisory Review Panel shall provide advice to_(i) DOE onthe fundamental issues of the design and development of the computer systemnecessary to implement the Licensing Support System under paragraph (b)of this section; and (ii) The LSS Administrator or the operation and maintenance of the LicensingSupport System under paragraph (d) of this section. (2) The responsibilities of the LSS Advisory Review Panel shall includeadvice on_(i) Format standards for the submission of documentary materialto the Licensing Support System by the parties, interested governmentalparticipants, or potential parties, such as ASCII files, bibliographicheaders, and images; (ii) The procedures and standards for the electronic transmission of filings,orders, and decisions during both the pre-license application phase andthe high-level waste licensing proceeding; (iii) Access protocols for raw data, field notes, and other items coveredby andSection; 2.1003(c) of this subpart; (iv) A thesaurus and authority tables; (v) Reasonable requirements for headers, the control of duplication, retrieval,display, image delivery, query response, and ``user friendly'' design;(vi) Other duties as specified in this subpart or as directed by the LSSAdministrator. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1012</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Compliance. </ITAG>(a) In addition to the requirements of andSection; 2.101(f) of this part,the Director of the NPC Office of Nuclear Materials Safety and Safeguardsmay determine that the tendered application is not acceptable for docketingunder this subpart, if the LSS Administrator has not issued the certificationdescribed in andSection; 2.1003(h)(1) of this part.(b)(1) A person, including a potential party granted access to the LicensingSupport System under andSection; 2.1008 of this subpart, shall not be grantedparty status under andSection; 2.1014 of this part, or status as an interestedgovernmental participant under andSection; 2.715(c) of this part, if it cannotdemonstrate substantial and timely compliance with ther requirements ofandSection; 2.1003 of this subpart at the time it requests participationin the high-level waste licensing proceeding under either andSection; 2.1014or andSection; 2.715(c) of this part. (2) A person denied party status or interested governmental participantstatus under paragraph (b)(1) of this section may request party statusor interested governmental participant status upon a showing of subsequentcompliance with the requirements of andSection; 2.1003 of this subpart. Admissionof such a party or interested governmental participant under andSection;2.1014 of this subpart or andSection; 2.715(c) of this part, respectively,shall be conditioned on accepting the status of the proceeding at the timeof admission. (c) The Hearing Licensing Board shall not make a finding of substantialand timely compliance pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subpart for anyperson who is not in compliance with all applicable orders of the Pre-LicenseApplication Licensing Board established pursuant to andSection; 2.1010 ofthis subpart. (d) Access to the Licensing Support System may be suspended or terminatedby the Pre-license Application Licensing Board or the Hearing LicensingBoard for any potential party, interested governmental participant or partywho is in noncompliance with any applicable order of the Pre-license ApplicationLicensing Board or the Hearing Licensing Board or the requirements of thissubpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1013 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Use of LSS during the adjudicatory proceeding. </ITAG>(a)(1) Pursuant to andSection; 2.702, the Secretary of the NRC will maintainthe official docket of the proceeding on the application for a licenseto receive and possess waste at a geologic repository operations area.(2) Commencing with the docketing of the license application to receiveand possess high-level radioactive waste at a geologic repository operationsarea pursuant to Part 60 of this chapter, the LSS Administrator shall establisha file within the Licensing Support System to contain the official recordmaterials of the high-level radioactive waste licensing proceeding in searchablefull text, or for material that is not suitable for entry in searchablefull text, by header and image, as appropriate. (b) Absent good cause, all exhibits tendered during the hearing must havebeen entered into the Licensing Support System before the commencementof that portion of the hearing in which the exhibit will be offered. Theofficial record file in the Licensing Support System will contain a listof all exhibits, showing where in the transcript each was marked for identificationand where it was received into evidence or rejected. Transcripts will beentered into the Licensing Support System by the LSS Administrator on adaily basis in order to provide next-day availability at the hearing. (c)(1) All filings in the adjudicatory proceeding on the license applicationto receive and possess high-level radioactive waste at a geologic respositoryoperations area pursuant to Part 60 of this chapter shall be transmittedelectronically by the submitter to the board(s), parties, the LSS Administrator,and the Secretary, according to established format requirements. Partiesand interested governmental participants will be required to use a passwordsecurity code for the electronic transmission of these documents. (2) Filings required to be served shall be served upon either the partiesand interested governmental participants, or their designated representatives.When a party or interested governmental participant has appeared by attorney,service must be made upon the attorney of record. (3) Service upon a party or interested governmental participant is completedwhen the sender receives electronic acknowledgment (``delivery receipt'')that the electronic submission has been placed in the recipient's electronicmailbox. (4) Proof of service, stating the name and address of the person on whomserved and the manner and date of service, shall be shown for each documentfiled, by_ (i) Electronic acknowledgment (``delivery receipt''); or (ii) The affidavit of the person making the service; or (iii) The certificate of counsel. (5) One signed paper copy of each filing shall be served promptly on theSecretary by regular mail pursuant to the requirements of andSection; 2.708and 2.701 of this part. (6) All Board and Commission issuances and orders will be transmitted electronicallyto the parties, interested governmental participants, and the LSS Administration.(d) Online access to the Licensing Support System, including a ProtectiveOrder File if authorized by a Board, shall be provided to the board(s),the representatives of the parties and interested governmental participants,and the witnesses while testifying, for use during the hearing. Use ofpaper copy and other images will also be permitted at the hearing. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1014</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Intervention. </ITAG>(a)(1) Any person whose interest may be affected by a proceeding on theapplication for a license to receive and possess high-level radioactivewaste at a geologic repository operations area pursuant to Part 60 of thischapter and who desires to participate as a party shall file a writtenpetition for leave to intervene. In a proceeding noticed pursuant to andSection;2.105 of this part, any person whose interest may be affected may alsorequest a hearing. The petition and/or request, and any request to participateunder andSection; 2.715(c) of this part, shall be filed within thirty daysafter the publication of the notice of hearing in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Nontimely filings will not be entertained absenta determination by the Commission, or the Hearing Licensing Board designatedto rule on the petition and/or request, that the petition and/or requestshould be granted based upon a balancing of the following factors, in additionto satisfying those set out in paragraphs (a)(2) and (c) of this section: (i) Good cause, if any, for failure to file on time; (ii) The availability of other means whereby the petitioner's interestwill be protected; (iii) The extent to which the petitioner's participation may reasonablybe expected to assist in developing a sound record; (iv) The extent to which the petitioner's interest will be representedby existing parties; (v) The extent to which the petitioner's participation will broaden theissues or delay the proceeding. (2) The petition shall set forth with particularity_(i) The interest of the petitioner in the proceeding, and how that interestmay be affected by the results of the proceeding, including the reasonswhy petitioner should be permitted to intervene, with particular referenceto the factors in paragraph (c) of this section; (ii) A list of the contentions that petitioner seeks to have litigatedin the matter, and the bases for each contention set forth with reasonablespecificity; (iii) Reference to the specific documentary material, or the absence thereofthat provides a basis for each contention; and (iv) As to each contention, the specific regulatory or statutory requirementto which the contention is relevant. (3) Any petitioner who fails to satisfy paragraphs (a)(2) (ii), (iii),and (iv) of this section with respect to at least one contention shallnot be permitted to participate as a party.(4) Any party may amend its contentions specified in paragraph (a)(2)(ii)of this section. The Hearing Licensing Board shall rule on any petitionto amend such contentions based on the balancing of the factors specifiedin paragraph (a)(1) of this section. Petitions to amend that are basedon information or issues raised in the Safety Evaluation Report (SER) issuedby the NRC staff shall be made no later than forty days after the issuanceof the SER. Any petition to amend contentions that is filed after thistime shall include, in addition to the factors specified in paragraph (a)(1)of this section, a showing that a significant safety or environmental issueis involved or that the amended contention raises a material issue relatedto the performance evaluation anticipated by andSection;andSection; 60.112and 60.113 of this chapter.(b) Any party or interested governmental participant may file an answerto a petition for leave to intervene or a petition to amend contentionswithin twenty days after service of the petition.(c) Subject to paragraph (a)(3) of this section, the Commission, or theHearing Licensing Board designated to rule on petitions to intervene and/orrequests for hearing shall permit intervention, in any hearing on an applicationfor a license to receive and possess high-level radioactive waste at ageologic repository operations area, by an affected unit of local governmentas defined in section 2(31) of the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982, asamended, 42 U.S.C. 10101. In all other circumstances, the Commission orBoard shall, in ruling on a petition for leave to intervene, consider thefollowing factors, among other things:(1) The nature of the petitioner's right under the Atomic Energy Act tobe made a party to the proceeding;(2) The nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial, or otherinterest in the proceeding;(3) The possible effect of any order that may be entered in the proceedingon the petitioner's interest;(d) An order permitting intervention and/or directing a hearing may beconditioned on such terms as the Commission, or the designated HearingLicensing Board may direct in the interests of:(1) Restricting irrelevant, duplicative, or repetitive evidence and argument,(2) Having common interests represented by a spokesman, and(3) Retaining authority to determine priorities and control the compassof the hearing.(e) In any case in which, after consideration of the factors set forthin paragraph (c) of this section, the Commission or the Hearing LicensingBoard finds that the petitioner's interest is limited to one or more ofthe issues involved in the proceeding, any order allowing interventionshall limit the petitioner's participation accordingly.(f) A person permitted to intervene becomes a party to the proceeding,subject to any limitations imposed pursuant to paragraph (e) of this section.(g) Unless otherwise expressly provided in the order allowing intervention,the granting of a petition for leave to intervene does not change or enlargethe issues specified in the notice of hearing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1015</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appeals.</ITAG>(a) No appeals from any Board order or decision issued under this subpartare permitted, except as prescribed in paragraphs (b), (c), (d), and (e)of this section.(b) A notice of appeal from (1) a Pre-License Application Licensing Boardorder issued pursuant to andSection; 2.1010 of this subpart, (2) a HearingLicensing Board First or Second Prehearing Conference Order issued pursuantto andSection; 2.1021 or andSection; 2.1022 of this subpart, (3) a HearingLicensing Board order granting or denying a motion for summary dispositionissued in accordance with andSection; 2.749 of this part, or (4) a HearingLicensing Board order granting or denying a petition to amend one or morecontentions pursuant to andSection; 2.1014(a)(4) of this subpart, shall befiled with the Atomic Safety and Licensing Appeal Board no later than ten(10) days after service of the order. A supporting brief shall accompanythe notice of appeal. Any other party, interested governmental participant,or potential party may file a brief in opposition to the appeal no laterthan ten days after service of the appeal.(c) Appeals from a Hearing Licensing Boards initial decision or partialinitial decision shall be filed and briefed before the Atomic Safety andLicensing Appeal Board in accordance with the requirements of andSection;2.762 of this part.(d) When, in the judgment of a Board, prompt appellate review of an ordernot immediately appealable under paragraph (b) of this section is necessaryto prevent detriment to the public interest or unusual delay or expense,the Board may refer the ruling promptly to the Appeal Board or Commission,as appropriate, and shall provide notice of this referral to the parties,interested governmental participants, or potential parties. The parties,interested governmental participants, or potential parties may also requestthat the Board certify, pursuant to andSection; 2.718(i) of this part, rulingsnot immediately appealable under paragraph (b) of this section.(e) A party, interested governmental participant, or potential party mayseek Commission review of any Appeal Board decision or order issued underthis section in accordance with the procedures in andSection; 2.786(b) ofthis part.(f) Unless otherwise ordered, the filing of an appeal, petition for review,referral, or request for certification of a ruling shall not stay the proceedingor extend the time for the performance of any act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1016</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Motions.</ITAG>(a) All motions shall be addressed to the Commission or, when a proceedingis pending before a Board, to the Board. All motions, unless made orallyon the record, shall be filed according to the provisions of andSection;2.1013(c) of this subpart.(b) A motion shall state with particularity the grounds and the reliefsought, and shall be accompanied by any affidavits or other evidence reliedon, and, as appropriate, a proposed form of order.(c) Within ten days after service of a motion a party, potential party,or interested governmental participant may file an answer in support ofor in opposition to the motion, accompanied by affidavits or other evidence.The moving party shall have no right to reply, except as permitted by theBoard or the Secretary or the Assistant Secretary.(d) The Board may dispose of motions either by order or by ruling orallyduring the course of a prehearing conference or hearing.(e) Where the motion in question is a motion to compel discovery underandSection; 2.720(h)(2) of this part or andSection; 2.1018(f) of this subpart,parties, potential parties, and interested governmental participants mayfile answers to the motion pursuant to paragraph (c) of this section. TheBoard in its discretion, may order that the answer be given orally duringa telephone conference or other prehearing conference, rather than filedelectronically. If responses are given over the telephone the Board shallissue a written order on the motion which summarizes the views presentedby the parties, potential parties, and interested governmental participantsunless the conference has been transcribed. This does not preclude theBoard from issuing a prior oral ruling on the matter which is effectiveat the time of its issuance, provided that the terms of the ruling areincorporated in the subsequent written order.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1017</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Computation of time.</ITAG>In computing any period of time, the day of the act, event, or defaultafter which the designated period of time begins to run is not included.The last day of the period so computed is included unless it is a Saturday,Sunday, or legal holiday at the place where the action or event is to occur,in which event the period runs until the end of the next day which is neithera Saturday, Sunday, nor holiday. Whenever a party, potential party, orinterested governmental participant, has the right or is required to dosome act within a prescribed period after the service of a notice or otherdocument upon it, one day shall be added to the prescribed period. If theLicensing Support System is unavailable for more than four access hoursof any day that would be counted in the computation of time, that day willnot be counted in the computation of time.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1018</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discovery.</ITAG>(a)(1) Parties, potential parties, and interested governmental participantsin the high-level waste licensing proceeding may obtain discovery by oneor more of the following methods: Access to the documentary material inthe Licensing Support System submitted pursuant to andSection; 2.1003 ofthis subpart; entry upon land for inspection, access to raw data, or otherpurposes pursuant to andSection; 2.1020 of this subpart; access to, or theproduction of, copies of documentary material for which bibliographic headersonly have been submitted pursuant to andSection; 2.1003 (c) and (d) of thissubpart; depositions upon oral examination pursuant to andSection; 2.1019of this subpart; requests for admission pursuant to andSection; 2.742 ofthis subpart; informal requests for information not available in the LicensingSupport System, such as the names of witnesses and the subjects they planto address; and interrogatories and depositions upon written questions,as provided in paragraph (a)(2) of this section.(2) Interrogatories and depositions upon written questions may be authorizedby order of the discovery master appointed under paragraph (g) of thissection, or if no discovery master has been appointed, by order of theHearing Licensing Board, in the event that the parties are unable, afterinformal good faith efforts, to resolve a dispute in a timely fashion concerningthe production of information. (b)(1) Parties, potential parties, and interested governmental participants,pursuant to the methods set forth in paragraph (a) of this section, mayobtain discovery regarding any matter, not privileged, which is relevantto the licensing of the likely candidate site for a geologic repository,whether it relates to the claim or defense of the person seeking discoveryor to the claim or defense of any other person. Except for discovery pursuantto andSection;andSection; 2.1018(a)(2) and 2.1019 of this subpart, all otherdiscovery shall begin during the pre-license application phase. Discoverypursuant to andSection;andSection; 2.1018(a)(2) and 2.1019 of this subpartshall begin after the issuance of the first pre-hearing conference orderunder andSection; 2.1021 of this subpart, and shall be limited to the issuesdefined in that order or subsequent amendments to the order. It is notground for objection that the information sought will be inadmissible atthe hearing if the information sought appears reasonably calculated tolead to the discovery of admissible evidence. (2) A party, potential party, or interested governmental participant mayobtain discovery of documentary material otherwise discoverable under paragraph(b)(1) of this section and prepared in anticipation of, or for the hearingby, or for another party's, potential party's, or interested governmentalparticipant's representative (including its attorney, surety, indemnitor,insurer, or similar agent) only upon a showing that the party, potentialparty, or interested governmental participant seeking discovery has substantialneed of the materials in the preparation of its case and that it is unablewithout undue hardship to obtain the substantial equivalent of the materialsby other means. In ordering discovery of these materials when the requiredshowing has been made, the Board shall protect against disclosure of themental impressions, conclusions, opinions, or legal theories of an attorneyor other representative of a party, potential party, or interested governmentalparticipant concerning the proceeding. (c) Upon motion by a party, potential party, interested governmental participant,or the person from whom discovery is sought, and for good cause shown,the Board may make any order that justice requires to protect a party,potential party, interested governmental participant, or other person fromannoyance, embarrassment, oppression, or undue burden, delay, or expense,including one or more of the following: (1) That the discovery not be had;(2) that the discovery may be had only on specified terms and conditions,including a designation of the time or place; (3) that the discovery maybe had only by a method of discovery other than that selected by the party,potential party, or interested governmental participant seeking discovery;(4) that certain matters not be inquired into, or that the scope of discoverybe limited to certain matters; (5) that discovery be conducted with noone present except persons designated by the Board; (6) that, subject tothe provisions of andSection; 2.790 of this part, a trade secret or otherconfidential research, development, or commercial information not be disclosedor be disclosed only in a designated way; (7) that studies and evaluationsnot be prepared. If the motion for a protective order is denied in wholeor in part, the Board may, on such terms and conditions as are just, orderthat any party, potential party, interested governmental participant orother person provide or permit discovery. (d) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section, and unless theBoard upon motion, for the convenience of parties, potential parties, interestedgovernmental participants, and witnesses and in the interest of justice,orders otherwise, methods of discovery may be used in any sequence, andthe fact that a party, potential party, or interested governmental participantis conducting discovery, whether by deposition or otherwise, shall notoperate to delay any other party's, potential party's, or interested governmentalparticipant's discovery. (e) A party, potential party, or interested governmental participant whohas included all documentary material relevant to any discovery requestin the Licensing Support System or who has responded to a request for discoverywith a response that was complete when made is under no duty to supplementits response to include information thereafter acquired, except as follows:(1) To the extent that written interrogatories are authorized pursuantto paragraph (a)(2) of this section, a party or interested governmentalparticipant is under a duty to seasonably supplement its response to anyquestion directly addressed to (i) the identity and location of personshaving knowledge of discoverable matters, and (ii) the identity of eachperson expected to be called as an expert witness at the hearing, the subjectmatter on which the witness is expected to testify, and the substance ofthe witness's testimony. (2) A party, potential party, or interested governmental participant isunder a duty seasonably to amend a prior response if it obtains informationupon the basis of which (i) it knows that the response was incorrect whenmade, or (ii) it knows that the response though correct when made is nolonger true and the circumstances are such that a failure to amend theresponse is in substance a knowing concealment. (3) A duty to supplement responses may be imposed by order of the Boardof agreement to the parties, potential parties, and interested governmentalparticipants. (f)(1) If a deponent of a party, potential party, or interested governmentalparticipant upon whom a request for discovery is served fails to respondor objects to the request, or any part thereof, the party, potential party,or interested governmental participant submitting the request or takingthe deposition may move the Board, within five days after the date of theresponse or after failure to respond to the request, for an order compellinga response in accordance with the request. The motion shall set forth thenature of the questions or the request, the response or objection of theparty, potential party, interested governmental participant, or other personupon whom the request was served, and arguments in support of the motion.For purposes of this paragraph, an evasive or incomplete answer or responseshall be treated as a failure to answer or respond. Failure to answer orrespond shall not be excused on the ground that the discovery sought isobjectionable unless the person, party, potential party, or interestedgovernmental participant failing to answer or respond has applied for aprotective order pursuant to paragraph (c) of this section. (2) In ruling on a motion made pursuant to this section, the Board maymake such a protective order as it is authorized to make on a motion madepursuant to paragraph (c) of this section. (3) An independent request for issuance of a subpoena may be directed toa nonparty for production of documents. This section does not apply torequests for the testimony of the NRC regulatory staff pursuant to andSection;2.720(h)(2)(i) of this part. (g) The Hearing Licensing Board pursuant to andSection; 2.722 of this partmay appoint a discovery master to resolve disputes between parties concerninginformal requests for information as provided in paragraphs (a)(1) and(a)(2) of this section. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1019 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Depositions. </ITAG>(a) Any party or interested governmental participant desiring to take thetestimony of any person by deposition on oral examination shall, withoutleave of the Commission or the Hearing Licensing Board, give reasonablenotice in writing to every other party and interested governmental participant,to the person to be examined, and to the Hearing Licensing Board of theproposed time and place of taking the deposition; the name and addressof each person to be examined, if known, or if the name is not known, ageneral description sufficient to identify him or her or the class or groupto which he or she belongs, the matters upon which each person will beexamined and the name or descriptive title and address of the officer beforewhom the deposition is to be taken. (b) Within the United States, a deposition may be taken before any officerauthorized to administer oaths by the laws of the United States or of theplace where the examination is held. Outside of the United States, a depositionmay be taken before a secretary of an embassy or legation, a consul general,vice consul or consular agent of the United States, or a person authorizedto administer oaths designated by the Commission. Depositions may be conductedby telephone or by video teleconference at the option of the party or interestedgovernmental participant taking the deposition.(c) The deponent shall be sworn or shall affirm before any questions areput to him or her. Examination and cross-examination shall proceed as ata hearing. Each question propounded shall be recorded and the answer takendown in the words of the witness. Objections on questions of evidence shallbe noted in short form without the arguments. The officer shall not decideon the competency, materiality, or relevancy of evidence but shall recordthe evidence subject to objection. Objections on questions of evidencenot made before the officer shall not be deemed waived unless the groundof the objection is one which might have been obviated or removed if presentedat that time.(d) When the testimony is fully transcribed, the deposition shall be submittedto the deponent for examination and signature unless the deponent is illor cannot be found or refuses to sign. The officer shall certify the depositionor, if the deposition is not signed by the deponent, shall certify thereasons for the failure to sign, and shall promptly transmit the depositionto the LSS Administrator for submission into the Licensing Support System.(e) Where the deposition is to be taken on written questions as authorizedunder andSection;2.1018(a)(2) of this subpart, the party or interested governmentalparticipant taking the deposition shall serve a copy of the questions,showing each question separately and consecutively numbered, on every otherparty and interested governmental participant with a notice stating thename and address of the person who is to answer them, and the name, description,title, and address of the officer before whom they are to be asked. Withinten days after service, any other party or interested governmental participantmay serve cross-questions. The questions, cross-questions, and answersshall be recorded and signed, and the deposition certified, returned, andtransmitted to the LSS Administrator as in the case of a deposition onoral examination.(f) A deposition will not become a part of the evidentiary record in thehearing unless received in evidence. If only part of a deposition is offeredin evidence by a party or interested governmental participant, any otherparty or interested governmental participant may introduce any other parts.A party or interested governmental participant shall not be deemed to makea person its own witness for any purpose by taking his or her deposition.(g) A deponent whose deposition is taken and the officer taking a depositionshall be entitled to the same fees as are paid for like services in thedistrict courts of the United States, to be paid by the party or interestedgovernmental participant at whose instance the deposition is taken.(h) The deponent may be accompanied, represented, and advised by legalcounsel.(i)(1) After receiving written notice of the deposition under paragraph(a) or paragraph (e) of this section, and ten days before the scheduleddate of the deposition, the deponent shall submit an index of all documentsin his or her possession, relevant to the subject matter of the deposition,including the categories of documents set forth in paragraph (i)(2) ofthis section, to all parties and interested governmental participants.The index shall identify those records which have already been enteredinto the Licensing Support System. All documents that are not identicalto documents already in the Licensing Support System, whether by reasonof subsequent modification or by the addition of notations, shall be treatedas separate documents. (2) The following material is excluded from initial entry into the LicensingSupport System, but is subject to derivative discovery under paragraph(i)(1) of this section_(i) Personal records;(ii) Travel vouchers;(iii) Speeches;(iv) Preliminary drafts;(v) Marginalia.(3) Subject to paragraph (i)(6) of this section, any party or interestedgovernmental participant may request from the deponent a paper copy ofany or all of the documents on the index that have not already been enteredinto the Licensing Support System.(4) Subject to paragraph (i)(6) of this section, the deponent shall bringa paper copy of all documents on the index that the deposing party or interestedgovernmental participant requests that have not already been entered intothe Licensing Support System to an oral deposition conducted pursuant toparagraph (a) of this section, or in the case of a deposition taken onwritten questions pursuant to paragraph (e) of this section, shall submitsuch documents with the certified deposition.(5) Subject to paragraph (i)(6) of this section, a party or interestedgovernmental participant may request that any or all documents on the indexthat have not already been entered into the Licensing Support System, andon which it intends to rely at hearing, be entered into the LSS by thedeponent.(6) The deposing party or interested governmental participant shall assumethe responsibility for the obligations set forth in paragraphs (i)(1),(i)(3), (i)(4), and (i)(5) of this section when deposing someone otherthan a party or interested governmental participant. (j) In a proceeding in which the NRC is a party, the NRC staff will makeavailable one or more witnesses designated by the Executive Director forOperations, for oral examination at the hearing or on deposition regardingany matter, not privileged, which is relevant to the issues in the proceeding.The attendance and testimony of the Commissioners and named NRC personnelat a hearing or on deposition may not be required by the Board, by subpoenaor otherwise: Provided, That the Board may, upon a showing of exceptionalcircumstances, such as a case in which a particular named NRC employeehas direct personal knowledge of a material fact not known to the witnessesmade available by the Executive Director for Operations, require the attendanceand testimony of named NRC personnel. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1020 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Entry upon land for inspection. </ITAG>(a) Any party, potential party, or interested governmental participantmay serve on any other party, potential party, or interested governmentalparticipant a request to permit entry upon designated land or other propertyin the possession or control of the party, potential party, or interestedgovernmental participant upon whom the request is served for the purposeof access to raw data, inspection and measuring, surveying, photographing,testing, or sampling the property or any designated object or operationthereon, within the scope of andSection; 2.1018 of this subpart. (b) The request may be served on any party, potential party, or interestedgovernmental participant without leave of the Commission or the Board.(c) The request shall describe with reasonable particularity the land orother property to be inspected either by individual item or by category.The request shall specify a reasonable time, place, and manner of makingthe inspection and performing the related acts. (d) The party, potential party, or interested governmental participantupon whom the request is served shall serve on the party, potential party,or interested governmental participant submitting the request a writtenresponse within ten days after the service of the request. The responseshall state, with respect to each item or category, that inspection andrelated activities will be permitted as requested, unless the request isobjected to, in which case the reasons for objection shall be stated. Ifobjection is made to part of an item or category, the part shall be specified.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1021 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">First prehearing conference. </ITAG>(a) In any proceeding involving an application for a license to receiveand possess high-level radioactive waste at a geologic repository operationsarea pursuant to Part 60 of this chapter the Commission or the HearingLicensing Board will direct the parties, interested governmetal participantsand any petitioners for intervention, or their counsel, to appear at aspecified time and place, within seventy days after the notice of hearingis published, or such other time as the Commission or the Hearing LicensingBoard may deem appropriate, for a conference to: (1) Permit identification of the key issues in the proceeding; (2) Take any steps necessary for further identification of the issues;(3) Consider all intervention petitions to allow the Hearing LicensingBoard to make such preliminary or final determination as to the partiesand interested governmental participants, as may be appropriate; (4) Establish a schedule for further actions in the proceeding; and (5) Establish a discovery schedule for the proceeding taking into accountthe objective of meeting the three year time schedule specified in section114(d) of the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 10134(d).(b) The Board may order any further formal and informal conferences amongthe parties and interested governmental participants including teleconferences,to the extent that it considers that such a conference would expedite theproceeding. (c) A prehearing conference held pursuant to this section shall be stenographicallyreported. (d) The Board shall enter an order which recites the action taken at theconference, the schedule for further actions in the proceeding, and anyagreements by the parties, and which identifies the key issues in the proceeding,makes a preliminary or final determination as to the parties and interestedgovernmental participants in the proceeding, and provides for the submissionof status reports on discovery. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1022 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Second prehearing conference. </ITAG>(a) The Commission or the Hearing Licensing Board in a proceeding on anapplication for a license to receive and possess high-level radioactivewaste at a geologic repository operations area shall direct the parties,interested governmental participants, or their counsel to appear at a specifiedtime and place not later than seventy days after the Safety EvaluationReport is issued by the NRC staff for a conference to consider: (1) Any amended contentions submitted under andSection; 2.1014(a)(4) of thissubpart; (2) Simplification, clarification, and specification of the issues; (3) The obtaining of stipulations and admissions of fact and of the contentsand authenticity of documents to avoid unnecessary proof; (4) Identification of witnesses and the limitation of the number of expertwitnesses, and other steps to expedite the presentation of evidence; (5) The setting of a hearing schedule; (6) Establishing a discovery schedule for the proceeding taking into accountthe objective of meeting the three year time schedule specified in section114(d) of the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 10134(d);and (7) Such other matters as may aid in the orderly disposition of the proceeding.(b) A prehearing conference held pursuant to this section shall be stenographicallyreported. (c) The Board shall enter an order which recites the action taken at theconference and the agreements by the parties, limits the issues or definesthe matters in controversy to be determined in the proceeding, sets a discoveryschedule, and sets the hearing schedule. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.1023 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Immediate effectiveness. </ITAG>(a) Pending review and final decision by the Commission, an initial decisionresolving all issues before the Hearing Licensing Board in favor of issuanceor amendment of a construction authorization pursuant to andSection; 60.31of this chapter or a license to receive and possess high-level radioactivewaste at a geologic repository operations area pursuant to andSection; 60.41of this chapter, will be immediately effective upon issuance except_ (1) As provided in any order issued in accordance with andSection; 2.788of this part that stays the effectiveness of an initial decision; or (2) As otherwise provided by the Commission in special circumstances. (b) The Director of Nuclear Material Safety and Safegurds, notwithstandingthe filing or pendency of an appeal or a petition for review pursuant toandSection; 2.1015 of this subpart, promptly shall issue a construction authorizationor a license to receive and possess high-level radioactive waste at a geologicrespository operations area, or amendments thereto, following an initialdecision resolving all issues before the Hearing Licensing Board in favorof the licensing action, upon making the appropriate licensing findings,except_ (1) As provided in paragraph (c) of this section; or (2) As provided in any order issued in accordance with andSection; 2.788of this part that stays the effectiveness of an initial decision; or (3) As otherwise provided by the Commission in special circumstances. (c)(1) Before the Director of Nuclear Material Safety and Safeguards mayissue a construction authorization or a license to receive and possesswaste at a geologic repository operations area in accordance with paragraph(b) of this section, the Commission, in the exercise of its supervisoryauthority over agency proceedings, shall undertake and complete a supervisoryexamination of those issues contested in the proceeding before the HearingLicensing Board to consider whether there is any significant basis fordoubting that the facility will be constructed or operated with adequateprotection of the public health and safety, and whether the Commissionshould take action to suspend or to otherwise condition the effectivenessof a Hearing Licensing Board decision that resolves contested issues ina proceeding in favor of issuing a construction authorization or a licenseto receive and possess high-level radioactive waste at a geologic repositoryoperations area. This supervisory examination is not part of the adjudicatoryproceeding. The Commission shall notify the Director in writing when itssupervisory examination conducted in accordance with this paragraph hasbeen completed. (2) Before the Director of Nuclear Material Safety and Safeguards issuesa construction authorization or a license to receive and possess high-levelradioactive waste at a geologic repository operations area, the Commissionshall review those issues that have not been contested in the proceedingbefore the Hearing Licensing Board but about which the Director must makeappropriate findings prior to the issuance of such a license. The Directorshall issue a construction authorization or a license to receive and possesshigh-level radioactive waste at a geologic repository operations area onlyafter written notification from the Commission of its completion of itsreview under this paragraph and of its determination that it is appropriatefor the Director to issue such a construction authorization or license.This Commission review of uncontested issues is not part of the adjudicatoryproceeding. (3) No suspension of the effectiveness of a Hearing Licensing Board's initialdecision or postponement of the Director's issuance of a construction authorizationor license that results from a Commission supervisory examination of contestedissues under paragraph (c)(1) of this section or a review of uncontestedissues under paragraph (c)(2) of this section will be entered except inwriting with a statement of the reasons. Such suspension or postponementwill be limited to such period as is necessary for the Commission to resolvethe matters at issue. If the supervisory examination results in a suspensionof the effectiveness of the Hearing Licensing Board's initial decisionunder paragraph (c)(1) of this section, the Commission will take reviewof the decision sua sponte and further proceedings relative to the contestedmatters at issue will be in accordance with procedures for participationby the DOE, the NRC staff, or other parties and interested governmentalparticipants to the Hearing Licensing Board proceeding established by theCommission in its written statement of reasons. If a postponement resultsfrom a review under paragraph (c)(2) of this section, comments on the uncontestedmatters at issue may be filed by the DOE within ten days of service ofthe Commission's written statement.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated at Rockville, MD this 7th day of April, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Samuel J. Chilk, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary of the Commission. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-8828 Filed 4-13-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7590-01-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>